After-School Enrichment A Guide to Improving or Designing After School Programs Participant's Handbook Constructing Quality The Out-of-School Time Collaborative Dillard University New Orleans, LA Materials and Training Provided By: Louisiana Division of Administration 1 After-School Enrichment Table of Contents SECTION ONE WELCOME AND OVERVIEW................................................2-5 SECTION TWO HOW TO DESIGN AN AFTER SCHOOL PROGRAM.............6-33 SECTION THREE MANAGING FOR QUALITY...............................................34-62 SECTION FOUR EVALUATION....................................................................63-73 SECTION FIVE CLOSING..........................................................................74-77 SECTION SIX APPENDIX......................................................................78-134 Louisiana Division of Administration 2 After-School Enrichment SECTION ONE Welcome and Overview Louisiana Division of Administration 3 After-School Enrichment Team Task: · Meet and greet the others at your table.
· Discuss the instructions given for this activity.
· Talk about how the work your "construction group" does and the work an after school professional does are alike.
· Be ready to share your ideas with the larger group.
Make sure to include a brief introduction of everyone at your table.
You will have 60-90 seconds to present your ideas.
· Have fun and be creative!
OUR IDEAS
...
Louisiana Division of Administration 4
After-School Enrichment
Overarching Goals
1.
To learn how to design new or improve existing after school programs, incorporating national best practices.
2.
To understand how to effectively manage and administer an after school program.
3.
To discuss various types of evaluation and performance indicators relevant to after school programs.
4.
To share a variety of resources and references.
5.
To build on the knowledge of the participants.
Louisiana Division of Administration 5
After-School Enrichment
NOTES...
Louisiana Division of Administration 6
After-School Enrichment
SECTION TWO How to Design an After School Program
Louisiana Division of Administration 7
After-School Enrichment
The Four Steps for Designing an After School Program Step One: Conducting a Needs Assessment Effective needs assessments determine how many people need an after school program and what type of program the people want.
It is also helpful to use needs assessments to determine how much families are able to pay for the program.
Obtaining this type of information is important to program organizers, but there are additional benefits from an effective needs assessment.
Data collected from the needs assessment can help build support for the program.
Skeptics may be swayed when they see how many people are in need of the proposed program.
Needs assessments can also help program designers fine-tune their original plan to better meet the needs of those they hope to serve.
Time spent conducting an effective needs assessment is time well spent.
Needs assessments should be distributed to parents and families of children that would or could attend the program.
Additional needs assessments should be sent out to key stakeholders.
One of the most commonly used forms of needs assessment in the after school arena is the questionnaire or paper and pencil survey.
This type of assessment is mailed out, handed out or delivered electronically.
The questionnaire is designed to ask questions that will provide important data to those setting up the program (see pages 78-79 for a sample).
Questionnaires or surveys provide very specific answers to the questions asked.
Questionnaires are usually inexpensive to administer.
However, making sense of the data can prove challenging to those charged with that responsibility.
Remember the ultimate function of the summary is to focus energy, not to record every minute detail! If paper and pencil surveys do not seem right for your needs, consider telephone surveys or the door-to-door canvassing of a Louisiana Division of Administration 8
After-School Enrichment
neighborhood.
The following suggestions on how to design a needs assessment are applicable to all three methods.
To help design your needs assessment, make sure you address the following issues.
Feel free to add to this list.
· Name, address and phone numbers (work, home and email if appropriate) · Ages of children in the family and school grade level · School attended · Information on the type of after school the family is currently using · Degree of satisfaction with that type of after school · Transportation needs · Hours of operation needed · Type of program families would like to see offered · Types of activities families would like to see offered · Parents ability to help with the planning of the program · Reading level and primary language of recipients Once the data has been collected and summarized it is a good idea to compile a short profile so the data can be shared in an organized and logical manner.
Findings from the needs assessment that relate to the following points should be covered in the profile.
· · · · · · · Number of children needing after school Children's ages and school grade level Desired location of the program Transportation needs Hours of operation Fee structure Proposed program philosophy or mission
In addition funders will probably require that you present secondary data.
Websites that may be helpful to you are listed below.
· http://www.doe.state.la.us Louisiana Division of Administration 9
After-School Enrichment
· http://www.dss.state.la.us · http://www.census.gov · http://www.gnocdc.org (Orleans, Jefferson, St. Bernard, Plaquemines, St. Tammany parishes only)
Louisiana Division of Administration 10
After-School Enrichment
Step Two: Establishing Partnerships Your presence at today's training reflects your connection to others; this is good because connecting with others leads to partnerships, which are critical to the success of your work with after school programs.
Perhaps you worked with others to conduct your needs assessment, if so you have already begun to make important connections.
If you worked on the needs assessment alone then now is the time to use the data and support you gained from the needs assessment to encourage others to join you.
Who are the key players in your area? It is important to identify who else needs to be included in your start-up or improvement plans.
Programs often achieve success when they include some of the key players listed below.
Keeping in mind that this is a general list, how could you personalize it for your program?
Our Guest List · School Personnel, such as principals, classroom teachers, teacher assistants, guidance counselors and school nurses · Parents · Community Organizations · Civic Groups · Faith-Based Organizations · Local Business · Departments of Community Education · Recreation Departments · Federal, state or county agencies · Members of local government · Local advocacy groups involved with children's issues · Universities, colleges, and technical schools
Who would you like to add to this list?
Louisiana Division of Administration 11
After-School Enrichment
Another strategy for increasing the likelihood of your success with step two is to create a sense of inviting others to join you rather than requiring or merely asking them to assist.
Your own enthusiasm and commitment is often the spark that motivates others to join you.
Louisiana Division of Administration 12
After-School Enrichment
Team Task One: You are going on a table scavenger hunt.
You only have to produce one of each of the five items.
When you have found all five, have one team member shout out "We've got it!" Good luck! Can you locate...
1.
2.
3.
4.
5.
A picture of a pyramid A screw that is less than one quarter of an inch long Pictures of two team members A picture of Andrew Jackson Something that starts with either the letter Q or Z
Louisiana Division of Administration 13
After-School Enrichment
Step Three: Utilizing the Information to Design the Program Designing Program Goals and Objectives: Ideally the data collected from your needs assessments and the collective wisdom gleaned from your partnerships will pave the way for the establishment of the program's mission or the revision of an existing mission.
Out of this mission come goals, objectives and tasks.
As we begin our discussion it is important to keep these following definitions in mind.
A goal is included in a proposal to provide an overall conceptual orientation to the ultimate purpose of the project.
Goals are usually abstract in content, broad in scope, less subject to direct measurement and focused on long-term perspectives.
Goals should describe aims that can reasonably be achieved by the completion of the project unless otherwise instructed by the funder.
Most projects have only one or two goals, but you should always defer to guidance given by the funder.
Example: Improve the academic performance of children at Carver
Middle School.
An objective should be specific, concrete, measurable, and address short-term or intermediate accomplishments.
A proposal may have many objectives and they may be of several different types.
Most objectives fall within several categories: product, process, performance, or behavioral.
Example: To increase the math grades of 80% of the Carver Middle
School students participating in the after school program at least 50% of the time by one letter grade by May 2004.
Louisiana Division of Administration 14
After-School Enrichment
A task is the means or method by which the organization will accomplish the objectives.
Tasks are specific, but not necessarily measurable.
There will be many tasks in the program design.
Tasks describe the steps one must take in order to reach the measurable objectives.
Examples: · Purchase the Voyager curriculum.
· Train teachers working in the after school program to use the
Voyager curriculum.
· Using the Voyager curriculum, focus on math skills two days each week.
The importance of goals and objectives should Goals and objectives define the outcomes of a they serve the purpose of stating what the accomplish.
Goals and objectives form the basis will answer important questions such as:
not be minimized.
project, additionally project intends to on which reviewers
· Is the project relevant to the goals of my funding source? · Will the project accomplish something that is significant, important, timely, innovative, and worthy of my support? · Will the proposed outcomes help solve an identified problem or need? · Are the intended outcomes of the project achievable and measurable? · Is the project reasonable in terms of the size and budget of my organization? · Can the project be expected to result in data or information that will tell whether the award was a success? · Are the suggested procedures appropriate to carry out the intended outcomes? · Is the budget reasonable for what will be achieved? · Is the experience and training of key staff appropriate to the purposes of the project or can you demonstrate the ability to get qualified staff?
Louisiana Division of Administration 15
After-School Enrichment
Remember...
Goals and objectives are the "heart" of your project, and they are what will require the most consensus among partners.
Begin writing your goals and objectives now.
Circulate them for input later before continuing with the remainder of the proposal.
Louisiana Division of Administration 16
After-School Enrichment
Team Task Two: Let's practice writing some goals, objectives and tasks.
On your first index card write a goal for an after school program.
Do not label it as a goal.
On the second index card do the same thing, except this time write down a measurable objective that would support the goal you have written.
On the third index card write down a task that supports your goal and your measurable objective.
Remember not to label your cards.
When you have finished turn to the person next to you and exchange cards.
See if you can determine which are each other's goal, objective and task.
Be ready to tell the rest of us how things went.
Louisiana Division of Administration 17
After-School Enrichment
Planning Program Tasks: "I like it best when my friends and I get to plan what we want to do.
Last week we made a play and the staff helped us with costumes, and now we're going to perform it for our families at a potluck dinner!" After school programs can provide children with the freedom they long for.
Most children are in a fairly structured environment all day.
When they get to your program they need time to relax, move at their own pace and pursue activities of their choice.
· Are there many different tasks for children to choose from? Do the choices include active play (dancing, running, jumping, climbing, exploring the environment and participating in sports), creative arts (arts and crafts, dramatic play and music), quiet time (chatting with friends, playing board games, spending time alone or in small groups) and enrichment activities (working on science projects, writing a newspaper, participating in math activities, doing homework or using computers)? Do the tasks give children the opportunities to learn in different ways and to test out new ideas? · Remember tasks can be fun and educational or helping children learn all at the same time! · Do the tasks match the mission of the program (e.g., school success, community involvement, recreation and leisure, social skills development, etc.)? Are the tasks well suited to the ages, interests and abilities of the children? Do the tasks reflect the cultures of the families served and introduce the children to new cultures? · Are the children involved in planning their tasks? Do tasks develop in response to children's interests? (For example, drum playing leads to the formation of a band; clay activity leads to a pottery
Louisiana Division of Administration 18
After-School Enrichment
class; an interest in baseball cards leads to learning about statistics.)
· Do the materials support the mission of the program? Are there enough materials so children are not waiting a long time to do an activity? Is there a range of materials to suit the ages and abilities of all the children? Are materials and equipment adapted for children with special needs?
Louisiana Division of Administration 19
After-School Enrichment
Team Task Three: With your table team discuss what quality tasks look like in after school programs.
Think big; do not let space constraints or budgets limit your discussion.
Once you have agreed on some ideas use the flip chart and markers provided to illustrate your thoughts.
See if you can incorporate our building theme into your drawing.
Be creative; draw some of your ideas and use words and phrases for others.
Watch your time.
Appoint a spokesperson.
Make sure to involve all members of your team.
We want your chart to be reflective of the entire group's ideas.
Remember the foundation of your drawing should be the program's goals or mission.
It is also important to keep in mind that one of the cornerstones of the programs you will be building is the academic enrichment or tutoring component required.
What other bricks or supports do you want to add to your drawings?
Louisiana Division of Administration 20
After-School Enrichment
Academic Activity Ideas for Your Program: Links to Learning: After school programs operating in the 21st century are continuously required to connect what happens during the school day with what takes place in the after school program.
School administrators around the country, as well as here in Louisiana, demand such linkages.
To help after school programs meet these demands, The National Institute on Out-of-School Time (NIOST) has developed a training for after school providers called "Links to Learning".
This training is built around the findings of Richard Murname of Harvard University and Frank Levy of MIT.
Their research suggests there are six basic skills children need to possess to succeed in today's world.
After school activities should help build the six skills.
These six skills are: · Literacy: Effectively Talking/Speaking, Drawing/Writing, Reading Text and Data, Listening, Locating information, Creating information · Numeracy: Understanding how numbers represent objects and amounts of objects · Written and Oral Communication Skills: Sharing thoughts or ideas with others in many forms · Problem Solving and Critical Thinking Skills: Not just math based, but everyday problems or situations · Knowledge of and comfort with Technology: Use of computers, electronic messaging, as well as machines and devices · Ability to Work with Diverse Groups of People: Comfort, skill and a desire to get along with and work collaboratively with people representing different ethnic, intellectual, philosophical, spiritual and experiential backgrounds
Louisiana Division of Administration 21
After-School Enrichment
In order to help children acquire these six skills, after school programs must: · Create an atmosphere that promotes experimentation.
After school programs that provide this type of environment involve the children in the arrangement of the furniture and materials.
· Provide adequate and appropriate materials and supplies.
Materials should be developmentally appropriate for the children in the program and in good repair.
Having the materials readily available for the children to use is also important.
· Offer a project-based approach to learning.
Project based activities suggest a long-term nature.
It is important that the after school program provides storage areas to accommodate these ongoing projects.
· Maintain a staff-child ratio that allows for meaningful and frequent interactions.
The National School Age Care Alliance suggests a ratio between 1:8 and 1:12 for children under the age of six.
For children aged six and older, The National School Age Care Alliances suggests a ratio of 1:10 to 1:15.
These ratios allow for meaningful and frequent interactions.
· Encourage children to apply their school-day learnings to their after school activities.
Communication between the after school staff and the school day staff allows for this reinforcement of learning.
To help you create links to learning in your after school program, a variety of activities has been included in pages 86-110 of the appendix.
Let's try one of those activities now.
Louisiana Division of Administration 22
After-School Enrichment
A Problem Needing Solved...
One day a man leaves his island in a rowboat and goes to the market.
Once there he buys a panther, a chicken and a bag of grain for the chicken to eat.
He carries them back to his boat.
(This is the boat the man uses to row back and forth to the island on which he lives.)
The problem is that he can only fit one of the three things he bought in the boat at a time.
So, the man has to think about what to take, when to take it, and what to leave behind.
He realizes that if he takes the panther first, leaving the chicken and grain behind, the chicken will eat the grain.
He also is aware of the fact that if he leaves the panther and chicken together the panther might eat the chicken.
What should he do? Help him determine the best strategy for getting all three items safely to the island in his boat.
Louisiana Division of Administration 23
After-School Enrichment
Enriched Learning Opportunities: The Louisiana Department of Education has identified the following as approved curricula choices for use in after school programs.
More complete information on each of these curricula is included in the appendix.
· Foundations ­ "Discovers" and/or "Invests" These are theme-based curricula for after school programs.
The themes are designed to reinforce academic skills.
These materials also have a strong multi-cultural component.
· Voyager After School These materials are designed to address the academic and social needs of children, as well as help to develop leadership skills.
They are theme-based and designed to be implemented in four and a half to five hours per week.
· Benchmark Education Company "Pathfinders" and/or "Trailblazers" This series is designed for one-on-one or small group use.
It focuses on literacy reinforcement and success.
Each lesson plan consists of a five-step format.
The materials are broken down into two groups, those suitable for grades K-2 and those suitable for grades 3-8.
· Fast ForWord Basic and Reading This is a learning and reading series designed to help boost children's skills in phonics, phonemic awareness, fluency, vocabulary and comprehension.
It uses computer software to individualize programs for students.
Louisiana Division of Administration 24
After-School Enrichment
Other Activity Ideas for Your Program As indicated earlier in this manual and in The National School Age Care Alliance Standards for Quality School-Age Care many different types of activities need to be offered to children in after school programs.
Programs must take care to ensure that the activities they offer reflect the program's mission, but at the same time offer children a balance and some choice in their after school hours.
The following list is meant to serve as a reference point for you as you plan your daily and weekly schedules.
Review the list.
Are these activities you currently offer or plan to offer? If not, why not? What steps can you take to make sure children have frequent opportunities to experience most of these types of activities? Remember including these types of activities is important to help children with their academic achievement.
Active physical play, both indoors and outdoors Nature walks or studies Arts and Crafts Dramatic play Music Dance Cooking Life Skills Quiet time with friends Time to be alone Board Games Pleasure Reading Long Term Projects Community Service Projects Nutritious Snack Remember these activities are in addition to the academic or tutorial component of your program.
Louisiana Division of Administration 25
After-School Enrichment
Spend a few minutes thinking about your program.
Using the table below as your worksheet try to draft a schedule that: 1.
Holds true to your mission 2.
Offers variety and choice for the children 3.
Honors the "givens" i.e. arrival at 2:45 4.
Incorporates many of the activities listed on the preceding page 5.
Incorporate ideas from the activity resources on your table Work with others from your program if applicable, if not work by yourself.
Be ready to share.
Time Monday Tuesday Wednesday Thursday Friday
Louisiana Division of Administration 26
After-School Enrichment
Step Four: Recruitment and Retention of Children Whether you are designing a brand new program or merely adding a component to an existing program, the need to recruit customers is there.
Recruiting well can make a tremendous difference.
Recruitment efforts should not be limited to fliers and brochures.
Word-of-mouth testimonials are very effective.
Often the program designers and leaders are some of your best recruiters.
Their wordof-mouth message is critical to recruiting and keeping children in the program.
Other helpful strategies are listed below.
Feel free to add your ideas to this list.
· Phone calls or visits to those who indicated a need for the program to elicit support · Posters displayed around town announcing the new program · Newsletters or bulletins · Newspaper ads · TV and radio announcements (public service announcements are typically free of charge) · Announcements made at civic meetings or from church pulpits · An open house where parents and children can come and meet the staff, take part in activities reflective of those offered by the program and have a snack similar to those the program offers Obviously recruitment is only half of the battle.
Retaining children in your program is critical.
Successful after school programs often involve the children in the planning of the activities.
Additionally programs that retain qualified and dedicated staff also are better able to continuously meet the needs of the children and families they serve.
As we will discuss in Section Five of this handbook, evaluation plays a key role in the retention of children and staff.
Louisiana Division of Administration 27
After-School Enrichment
What strategies and techniques have you used to retain children in your after school programs?
Louisiana Division of Administration 28
After-School Enrichment
Team Task Four: Discuss ways you see applying the four steps we have introduced to your start-up or program improvement efforts.
Record your ideas and those from the other groups in the boxes provided.
Note for this activity it is acceptable to work alone or with others from your program.
Step One: Conducting a Needs Assessment
Step Two: Establishing Partnerships
Step Three: Utilizing the Information to Design the Program
Step Four: Recruitment and Retention of Children
Louisiana Division of Administration 29
After-School Enrichment
IDEAS FOR STEP ONE
Louisiana Division of Administration 30
After-School Enrichment
IDEAS FOR STEP TWO
Louisiana Division of Administration 31
After-School Enrichment
IDEAS FOR STEP THREE
Louisiana Division of Administration 32
After-School Enrichment
IDEAS FOR STEP FOUR
Louisiana Division of Administration 33
After-School Enrichment
NOTES...
Louisiana Division of Administration 34
After-School Enrichment
SECTION THREE Managing for Quality
Louisiana Division of Administration 35
After-School Enrichment
The NSACA Standards for Quality SchoolAge Care The NSACA Standards for Quality have six cornerstones.
They are referred to as categories.
Those six categories are Human Relationships, Indoor Environment, Outdoor Environment, Activities, Safety, Health and Nutrition, and Administration.
Each category has keys that support it and each key has four related standards.
Let's spend a few minutes looking at the pamphlet you have been given to understand the format of the standards a little better.
Review the pamphlet; discuss it with a partner.
What do you like about the pamphlet? What is confusing about it? Remember these are indicators of a high level of quality and something that may take a program several years to achieve.
Jot down a few thoughts below.
Louisiana Division of Administration 36
After-School Enrichment
THE ELEMENTS OF QUALITY To run a great program takes thought and skill.
It takes creative team effort and constant, gradual change to create the best possible after school opportunities for children.
Refer to these pages as you go about constructing quality after school programs:
HUMAN RELATIONSHIPS "The staff here is really cool.
They do stuff with us and talk with us and we have a lot of fun.
It makes me really want to come here."
What we are talking about here is at the very heart of any school-age program.
If staff members respond to children sensitively, you will have the main ingredient for a great program.
If the emotional environment is one of acceptance and understanding for children, families and staff, the program will be a positive experience for everyone.
These questions will help you to check on the emotional climate of your program:
· Does the staff make children feel welcome and treat them with
respect? Is the staff compassionate about the children's many feelings? Does the staff have time to talk with individual children and get to know each child's interests, abilities and talents? Is the staff culturally responsive?
· Is the staff actively involved with children? Do they work with the
children everyday to build positive relationships and model communication? Do they help children make informed and responsible decisions? Does the staff have realistic expectations of children? Does the staff help children without taking control?
· Does the staff model cooperation and respect? Does the staff set
appropriate limits for children? Do they help children learn how to solve their conflicts? Do the children cooperate and show respect for each other? Louisiana Division of Administration 37
After-School Enrichment
· Are families welcome at the program and do they feel well informed? Do the staff and families work together to make this a positive experience for the children? Are the diverse needs of families recognized and viewed as strengths? Is the staff responsive to issues affecting the children's lives outside of the program?
INDOOR ENVIRONMENT "I like being able to move around to different places.
Some days I like going to the gym and some days I like working with the computers.
Sometimes I just like to go to the loft to read.
The best part is that I can pick where I want to be."
A good program has space that feels cozy and comfortable and has interest areas.
Every space can be improved with imagination and enthusiasm.
Those who run programs located in "dedicated" space are free to shape that space as they wish.
Programs that share space can make the curriculum mobile.
Stackable containers, large pillows, moveable storage cabinets and moveable furniture will help mobility.
Design the space around the needs of children and the goals of the program.
Look for the following to see if your program has a quality indoor environment: · Are the space, furniture and equipment organized to support a wide range of program activities? Are there areas for active play, quiet work and play, messy activities, eating and various social groupings? Can several activities go on at the same time without disrupting one another? · Is there adequate storage? Is there a place where children and staff can store their personal belongings? Can children get materials out and put them away on their own with ease? · Are there soft, comfortable spaces for relaxation and privacy for children who have been in large-group settings all day? Does the space reflect the work and interests of the children? Louisiana Division of Administration 38
After-School Enrichment
· Is the space comfortable for everyone? Can children do their activities without feeling crowded? Can people with disabilities get around the space? Can they use the equipment?
OUTDOOR ENVIRONMENT "The first month I was here I met my friends and we played hopscotch every day.
That was the best.
Now I'm building a clubhouse with some wood and recycled material.
When it's finished, we're going to make a club."
To promote healthy development, children need time outdoors to move, run and play.
They need a full range of outdoor experiences, including opportunities for sports and games, gardening, camping, exploring, climbing, running and jumping.
Ideally, there will be as many outdoor choices as there are indoor choices.
There should also be places for quiet play.
Programs in urban areas may not have an outdoor play area.
Even if there are outdoor spaces, they may not be safe.
Staff and families may need to work together to find an outdoor play area that is safe, and use transportation to take the children there.
· Does each child have a chance to play outdoors for at least 30 minutes each afternoon? · Is there large motor space indoors when the weather is bad? · Is the space suitable for a wide variety of activities? Can various activities take place at the same time without crowding?
· Does the equipment allow children to be independent and
creative? Is it appropriate for the interests and abilities of all children? Does the space provide safe challenges for children of all ages, including those with special needs?
Louisiana Division of Administration 39
After-School Enrichment
SAFETY, HEALTH, AND NUTRITION "They have the best food here.
I especially like it when I can help with cooking projects.
Also, if I've missed snack and I'm hungry at the end of the day, they always let me have an apple."
School-age children like to eat! With many programs open until 6 p.m., children need a substantial, nutritious snack to keep them going until they can eat dinner at home.
Children who seem to present behavior problems may be lacking a healthy diet.
Sometimes the way to a child's heart is through her or his stomach.
It is also natural for school-age kids to take risks.
It can be a struggle to look out for their safety and health and still provide a program that allows them to explore the world in a way that is natural to them.
Children need to be supervised by staff members that are trained to reduce the risks and handle emergencies.
· Does the program serve healthy foods? Is there enough food to meet the needs of children of all ages and sizes? Is food available at times when children are hungry? Do the children seem to like the food? · Are steps taken to protect and improve the health of children? Is the facility clean? Is food served under sanitary conditions? Are hands washed frequently and sick children cared for separately to help prevent the spread of germs? Are children protected from health hazards including toxic or allergic substances? · Are the safety and security of the children protected? Are arrivals and departures carefully supervised? Does the staff know the people the children are released to? Are entrances and exits supervised? Are there any observable safety hazards? Is all play equipment safe for active play? When accidents do happen, are the staff trained to handle emergencies and equipped with first-aid materials?
Louisiana Division of Administration 40
After-School Enrichment
· Does the staff know how to spot signs of child abuse and know how to report it? Are they prepared to identify other issues related to health and development such as eating disorders, malnutrition and depression? · See appendix page 120 for some healthy snack suggestions.
ADMINISTRATION You will not hear kids saying, "I really like the budget this quarter; I are adequate resources, low staff turnover and professional development for staff.
really like your staff-hiring decisions; I'm glad Mary has been here for three years..." but you can be sure the children will benefit if there
At the core of a quality program are leaders who have experience working with children and strong administrative skills.
Good administrators struggle every day to build and maintain programs that are accessible and affordable.
The director plays a key role in supporting staff and developing relationships with families and the community.
The director also manages program finances and maintains records.
It is usually the director who supervises support services such as transportation.
· Do staff-child ratios and group sizes allow staff to meet the children's needs? Are children given enough staff time so that they are not rushed? Is there enough staff to handle both an emergency and regular childcare? · Do the leaders encourage families, host, and community to become partners in making this the best possible program? Is there good communication with families and are they involved in setting goals for individual children and the program? Is the host engaged in supporting the program and setting policies that work for both organizations? Are community resources tapped to support the program and provide activities for children?
Louisiana Division of Administration 41
After-School Enrichment
· Are policies and procedures in place to protect the health and safety of the children? · Does staff know what these policies and procedures are? Do you meet state and local guidelines for safety and health? · Do family and personnel policies work toward making this a great program? Do you hire staff that is qualified to work with schoolage children? Are staff salaries adequate to reduce turnover? Are program fees affordable for families? The answers to these questions often reveal a delicate balancing of resources.
· Are there adequate supports to staff? Are they given an orientation to the job before working with children? Are staff members asked about their training needs? Do they receive at least 10 hours of training per year to meet these needs? Does staff receive appropriate support (benefits, wages, discussion time, input into the program) to make their work experience positive? · Does the management of the program support the program goals? Does the budget support program goals? Do you evaluate the program annually and work on continuous improvement?
Louisiana Division of Administration 42
After-School Enrichment
Team Task One: As a table team, return to the drawing you began earlier today.
It reflects your ideas regarding quality activities in after school programs.
It is time to add to your drawing.
Consider the focus your group has been given.
Review the NSACA pamphlet and pages 36-41 in this book.
How can you improve your drawing? Add new bricks, new supports and new ideas to reflect quality.
Remember we want to build solid structures without any quality gaps.
Be ready to share.
Louisiana Division of Administration 43
After-School Enrichment
IDEAS FOR QUALITY HUMAN RELATIONSHIPS
Louisiana Division of Administration 44
After-School Enrichment
IDEAS FOR QUALITY ENVIRONMENTS (INDOOR AND OUTDOOR)
Louisiana Division of Administration 45
After-School Enrichment
IDEAS FOR SAFETY, HEALTH AND NUTRITION
Louisiana Division of Administration 46
After-School Enrichment
IDEAS FOR QUALITY ADMINISTRATION
Louisiana Division of Administration 47
After-School Enrichment
Team Task One: · · · · · · · Discuss your "animal style" Talk about the positive characteristics of your style Talk about some of the challenging aspects of your style Use the appropriate page to record your thoughts Appoint a spokesperson Watch your time Make sure to include everyone's ideas
OUR IDEAS...
Louisiana Division of Administration 48
After-School Enrichment
Positive Characteristics of this style
Challenging Characteristics of this style
Louisiana Division of Administration 49
After-School Enrichment
Positive Characteristics of this style
Challenging Characteristics of this style
Louisiana Division of Administration 50
After-School Enrichment
Positive Characteristics of this style
Challenging Characteristics of this style
Louisiana Division of Administration 51
After-School Enrichment
Positive Characteristics of this style
Challenging Characteristics of this style
Louisiana Division of Administration 52
After-School Enrichment
Four Scenarios Scenario A: Situation: The Somewhere in Louisiana After School Program recently hired a new staff member.
The young man hired has after school experience and a strong educational background.
He is one of four staff members.
He has been with the program for three months.
He was off to a great start, but for the past four to five weeks the director has noticed that he is arriving late several times a week.
Additionally he has not turned in his weekly planning sheet for the last month and he has not been conducting the portion of the playground safety inspection for which he is responsible.
The director has yet to address the situation.
She is aware of his tardiness and she knows that some of the other staff members are completing his planning sheets and safety checks for him.
Director's Perspective: I know our new group leader is going through a rough time.
His mom has been sick and he and his girlfriend just broke up, I feel sorry for him.
The last thing I want to do is add to his troubles.
Besides the other staff members seem happy to pinch-hit for him, and that is what teamwork is all about.
I think I will just lie low for a while and hope things improve soon.
Other Staff's Perspective: Boy does our director ever play favorites.
She is not doing one thing to the new guy.
He is always late; I remember when the director used to dock our pay for being late.
And we have to do all of his paperwork.
I know he does a great job with the kids, and the parents love him, but this is not fair!
Louisiana Division of Administration 53
After-School Enrichment
Scenario B: The Situation: The Somewhere in Louisiana After School Program just enrolled a new family in their program.
The family has a son, a large, aggressive third grader.
The staff members have come to the director with their concerns about the new boy.
He has been namecalling and starting fights with other boys and girls in his group.
He bullies other children into letting him have his way.
Upon hearing this, the director promptly scheduled a conference with the parents.
The staff members were not informed of the conference until after it took place.
Rumor has it the director talked during most of the conference; he too has a son who went through a similar phase.
The director told the parents what he did to remedy the situation and suggested they do the exact same thing.
After the conference the director told staff that he had fixed the situation and there should be no more problems.
Director's Perspective: I know how hard it is to have an aggressive son who is perceived as a bully by his teachers.
I remember so clearly the troubles I went through with my own son.
I read a book about how to deal with aggressive behavior in children and I went to a seminar on the subject.
I fixed the situation with my son.
I know these parents can do it too.
I told them what to do and gave them a list.
Now I just need to make sure they follow through.
There is no need for my staff to worry; I have it all under control.
Staff's Perspective: Well I guess our director doesn't care what we think about this situation.
I could not believe he didn't tell us about the parent conference he scheduled.
I guess he thinks that if he spends 15 minutes in a classroom then he has seen it all and knows exactly what is going on.
I know I shouldn't have agreed with those parents when they called our director "Mr. Know it All", but that is sure how he is acting!
Louisiana Division of Administration 54
After-School Enrichment
Scenario C: The Situation: The Somewhere in Louisiana After School Program has just hired a new director.
She is excited about her new job.
She knows how important it is to have the children like you.
She spends at least 90 minutes a day playing games with the kids, doing projects with the kids, and playing outside with the kids.
She is a very active, energetic young woman.
Sometimes the play turns into roughhousing and the children get so excited that they do not remember the program rules.
When this happens the director quickly leaves the area and depends on the staff to remind the children of the rules and take any disciplinary action needed.
Director's Perspective: Wow, am I nervous.
I was so excited to get my first job as a director.
Everything will go just fine as long as the kids like me and everyone has fun.
I just really want the kids to think our program is cool and then they will tell their parents, their friends, their teachers and anyone else they know.
That would be great! Staff's Perspective: We all really like the new director.
She seems enthusiastic, creative and full of energy.
However, she is always playing with the kids.
We can never find her in her office when we need to talk to her about problems we are having with the program.
About four weeks ago we asked her to talk to a parent that is consistently late picking up her child, but she still has not spoken to that parent.
In the meantime, we have to stay late every night until that parent comes.
And she gets the kids so riled up; it takes forever to calm them down.
She doesn't seem to enforce the rules, but then she talks about the importance of effective behavior management techniques at our staff meetings.
We don't know what to think.
Louisiana Division of Administration 55
After-School Enrichment
Scenario D: The Situation: The Somewhere in Louisiana After School Program is currently located in a school building.
However, recently the church next door approached the director and asked her to move the program to their building.
They have offered a gym, kitchen and several classrooms free of charge.
The church sees this as part of their outreach ministry to the children of the area.
The director needs to respond to the church board in a timely manner, if she declines their offer then the church may open their own program.
The director is excited about the partnership with the church, but she is a cautious, analytical woman.
She wants to read more on churchbased programs, talk to other directors and make sure she is making the right decision.
Director's Perspective: Gosh, this is wonderful opportunity.
Our program could move and have much better space than we have now.
I feel sure that if the children have more room, the staff could plan a wider variety of activities.
However, I am nervous too.
Change is always hard.
What if this doesn't work out? I need to talk to other directors who are in similar situations.
I want to discuss it with my staff, the children and their parents, but that could take weeks.
The church needs their decision in 10 days.
What should I do? The Church's Perspective: We don't know what to make of all of this.
We offered our space to the after school program next door, but their director seems to be incapable of giving us an answer.
We know she runs a good program and we think this would be a good thing for us and for them.
What is her hold-up? We need to move on things quickly.
Louisiana Division of Administration 56
After-School Enrichment
Eight Great Ates for After School Leaders Create: Leaders of after school programs must be creative.
To lead well leaders must have a vision of where it is they want to go.
Often the vision is not of something that already exists, rather it is built on new ideas or concepts.
Creative thinking also comes into play for leaders when they demonstrate the ability to think outside the box or look at situations from a variety of perspectives.
Anticipate: Effective leaders plan well.
They look ahead and foresee potential problems and possible solutions.
This advance planning enables them to be more effective and better prepared in times of crisis.
Anticipatory leaders are often able to predict future trends that will impact the nature of their program, the needs of the families and children they serve and the needs of the staff.
Communicate: Great communicators often become great leaders.
Leaders need to be able to share their message in a clear way choosing words that convey meaning in a non-threatening and empowering way.
Effective communication involves the spoken and the written word as well as the ability to listen.
Louisiana Division of Administration 57
After-School Enrichment
Participate: Active participation in the day-to-day operations of the after school program is another hallmark of effective leaders.
Staff must believe that their supervisor is both capable of and willing to do that which they are asking of the staff.
Active participation by leaders also helps to ensure that the directors are taking the pulse of the programs.
Educate: Teaching staff and helping them grow professionally is a critical part of effective leadership.
Leaders who supply resources, materials and emotional support to their staff meet with much success.
Establishing policies and procedures that clearly stipulate what is to be done and by whom is an integral part of effective leaders' jobs.
Another part of educating staff is allowing them opportunities to spread their wings through appropriate delegation.
Motivate: Who among us cannot remember someone in their life who gave them an extra nudge, thereby helping them to succeed? Leaders need to give those gentle nudges.
After school leaders are charged with the task of empowering their staff to succeed and achieve the program goals.
Leading is part coaching.
Successful coaches build on a player's strengths and compensate for team or player weaknesses.
Louisiana Division of Administration 58
After-School Enrichment
Appreciate: Valuing staff members for their unique contributions is another duty of effective leaders.
Leaders who allow staff's individuality to shine through recognize the importance of appreciating staff members' individual talents and gifts.
Effective leaders praise staff's success and help the staff use their mistakes as opportunities to grow and learn.
Evaluate: Effective leaders provide their staff with objective, relevant and specific feedback.
After school leaders help staff when they explain what is expected of them, observe them to see how they are doing and then provide them with appropriate feedback that applauds their successes and helps pinpoint areas for growth.
Louisiana Division of Administration 59
After-School Enrichment
Team Task Two: · Reflect on what has been shared.
· Focus on your group's scenario.
· Discuss how an effective leader would respond in this situation.
· Include the information shared on pages 56-58 of your manual.
· Using the package of clay you have been given sculpt a new, hybrid leader.
Have this leader reflect the best of the four animal styles we have discussed.
· Create a list of this animal's strengths.
· Be ready to share with the rest of the group.
OUR IDEAS...
Louisiana Division of Administration 60
After-School Enrichment
Characteristics of Effective Leaders
Louisiana Division of Administration 61
After-School Enrichment
Which Am I? I watched them tear a building down, A gang of men in a busy town With a mightily heave and a lusty yell They swung a boom, and a sidewall fell, I said to the foreman, "Are these folks as skilled, As those you'd hire if you had to build?" He just gave a laugh and said, "No indeed, Just a common laborer is all I need, And I can wreck in a day or two What it took the builder a year to do."
And I thought to myself as I went my way "Just which of these roles have I tried to play? Am I a wrecker as I walk the town, Content with the labor of tearing down? Or am I a builder, who works with care, Making the place better because I was there."
Louisiana Division of Administration 62
After-School Enrichment
NOTES...
Louisiana Division of Administration 63
After-School Enrichment
SECTION FOUR Evaluation
Louisiana Division of Administration 64
After-School Enrichment
Remember a time in your life when you were involved in an unpleasant evaluation experience.
This memory does not have to be associated with your professional life; it can reflect a personal experience.
Recall what happened and what made it so unpleasant.
Jot down a few adjectives that describe the situation.
When you have completed this, turn and share your memory with a partner.
Louisiana Division of Administration 65
After-School Enrichment
Team Task One: As a team, look at the unpleasant or ineffective 10 positive words that effective evaluation.
If please do so. list of negative words describing evaluations.
Discuss and decide on you would choose to describe you want to write more than 10,
Louisiana Division of Administration 66
After-School Enrichment
OUR WORDS 1.
2.
3.
4.
5.
6.
7.
8.
9.
10.
Louisiana Division of Administration 67
After-School Enrichment
Characteristics of Effective Evaluations Timely Specific Accurate Relevant Objective Constructive Ongoing or Formative Summative Aligned with job description
Look back at the list we came up with together, how does it compare with this list?
Louisiana Division of Administration 68
After-School Enrichment
Two Types of Evaluation Formative Evaluation: Formative evaluation can be classified as feedback that is given on an ongoing basis.
Formative evaluation occurs frequently over a period of time.
Formative evaluation is designed to help us learn as we go, thereby quickly allowing us to implement new strategies.
Summative Evaluation: Summative evaluation is feedback given at the end of a project or some other specified time frame.
It summarizes and takes a look back at the project, course, or other event.
Summative evaluation enables us to review our experience and make general statements about what took place.
Louisiana Division of Administration 69
After-School Enrichment
Three Methods of Evaluation Participant Satisfaction: Member or participant satisfaction evaluation measures the perception of the people involved in the program.
Such methods ask a wide variety of people involved in the program for their feedback.
The methods for conducting this type of evaluation are varied.
They might include surveys, focus groups, questionnaires or interviews.
The questionnaires found in the self-study component of NSACA's ARQ Kit are examples of this method of evaluation.
Other less formal member satisfaction evaluations might include a survey for parents and families to complete.
Often after school programs survey their staff and the children to get their input.
There are several sample surveys in the Appendix; one dealing with gaining input from children, another from the families, and the third is designed to obtain feedback from staff.
Quality Assurance: Quality Assurance Methods demonstrate that a program is effective by showing it includes components proven to produce positive results.
Quality Assurance methods let a program demonstrate that it is consistently including critical components; components that scientific research has already shown to provide positive outcomes.
Typically this Louisiana Division of Administration 70
After-School Enrichment
type of evaluation is conducted by observing the program following a highly structured protocol.
The National School Age Care Alliance Observation Tool is an example of a Quality Assurance Evaluation.
This observation tool allows observers to rate after school programs using a four-point scale on each of the 144 standards.
Another example of a Quality Assurance Evaluation method is the Self-Assessment Monitoring Tool (SAM).
This instrument was designed by the Louisiana Department of Education to be used to self assess your program.
A copy has been included in the appendix on pages 124-133.
Let's turn to it now and briefly review it.
Performance Indicators/Outcome Objectives: This method of evaluation allows a program to select a specific outcome they hope to achieve and determine to what extent they have achieved it.
Programs use outcome measurements to determine how much change has occurred in a specific outcome.
They track specific behaviors such as attendance and contact hours with the after school program, retention rates, school grades, and scores on standardized tests such as LEAP and IOWA.
The collection of data in this type of evaluation ranges from test scores to percentage of students retained at a certain grade level to number of hours spent in after school on a weekly basis.
It is important to keep in mind that evaluations must: 1.
Put together data 2.
Be based on ongoing observations Louisiana Division of Administration 71
After-School Enrichment
3.
Involve communication between those being evaluated and those doing the evaluation.
In the after school arena those parties would include the after school staff, the school staff, the parents, the children and the program administrators.
Louisiana Division of Administration 72
After-School Enrichment
A Relevant Thought...
"Without data you're just another person with an opinion!"
Louisiana Division of Administration 73
After-School Enrichment
NOTES...
Louisiana Division of Administration 74
After-School Enrichment
SECTION FIVE Closing
Louisiana Division of Administration 75
After-School Enrichment
Team Task: Think back over what we have discussed today.
Remember the large group discussions and your small group work.
What would you like to add to your "toolbox"? What resources, skills or concepts do you want to make sure to take away with you today? These tools are things that will help you be a more effective after school leader.
These tools may reflect new ideas you have learned or tried and true techniques upon which you rely.
Discuss them as a table and then use the next page to record your answers.
Louisiana Division of Administration 76
After-School Enrichment
What would you like to add to your "Quality After School Toolbox"? 1.
2.
3.
4.
5.
6.
Louisiana Division of Administration 77
After-School Enrichment
NOTES...
Louisiana Division of Administration 78
After-School Enrichment
SECTION SIX Appendix
Louisiana Division of Administration 79
After-School Enrichment
Sample Needs Questionnaire TO: FROM:
Parent of your Elementary School's Name Name of Your Organization
DO YOU NEED AN AFTER SCHOOL PROGRAM? This year the name of your organization is conducting a study of after school child care programs.
Such programs have evolved primarily, though not exclusively, to meet the needs of working parents.
They are geared toward the elementary school age child, providing a stimulating but comfortable environment during nonschool hours, vacations and holidays.
The name of your organization has designed this questionnaire to determine if a need exists here in name of your community for the type of programs now being offered in several neighboring communities.
Please answer the questions below and return one questionnaire per household to your child's teacher or school office.
All responses will be treated confidentially.
1a.
Are you currently making arrangements for after school care for your elementary school aged child/children on a regular basis? _____ YES, 5 days/week 1b.
_____ NO
If yes, would you consider or prefer an after school full or part time program of recreational/educational activities as opposed to your present arrangements? _____ YES, consider _____ YES, prefer _____ NO
If you answered NO to question 1a, please answer 1c and 1d below.
Louisiana Division of Administration 80
After-School Enrichment
1c.
Would you take advantage of such a program even though you do not have the need of after school care? _____ YES _____ NO
1d.
Do you anticipate having this need within the next five years? _____ YES _____ NO
2.
If a well conceived, quality after school program was initiated would you be willing to pay for it via a reasonable fee or tuition? _____ YES _____ NO
3.
Please indicate how important each of the following features would be in deciding whether to use an after school program.
Very Important a) Cost b) Transportation c) Types of Activities Offered d) Coverage on school holidays/release days e) Other Somewhat Important Not Important
4.
The following is a list of activities frequently offered in after school programs.
Please circle the five activities you would most like to see offered in an after school program.
Dance Foreign Language Gymnastics Cooking Homework room Sports Exercise classes Woodworking Arts and Crafts Music Reading room Other (please list) Tutoring Music Free play Field Trips Drama
Louisiana Division of Administration 81
After-School Enrichment
Louisiana Department of Education After School Curricula Choices 1.
Foundations- "Discovers" and/or "Invests" In response to the need for high quality, user-friendly materials for extended-day programs, FOUNDATIONS has developed and published three theme-based curricula for grades K-6, and two more are in process.
In addition, three secondary school curriculum modules, specially designed to engage older students, are written and near publication.
Each yearlong K-6 curriculum centers on a theme and is designed to reinforce academic skills in reading, writing and mathematics.
Sample themes include discovery and inventions.
Daily lesson plans incorporate technology and also include recreational activities and time for social interaction.
Lessons feature cooperative group work as well as independent projects.
All curricula are literature-based and involve studying award-winning books by a broad array of well-known authors.
The books and materials expose students to many different cultures in the U.S. and foreign countries.
The lessons accommodate multiple teaching and learning styles.
Students learn by reading, writing, listening, reasoning, and through hands-on activities.
Each curriculum unit is aligned with national standards, which often exceed those of local districts, and is suitable for almost any setting.
FOUNDATIONS believes in a balanced approach to extended-day programming, in holistic learning, and in strengthening children academically, intellectually and socially.
As a result, each curriculum guide integrates many content areas but also recognizes that children need to interact with other children and adults, to play and to receive support and encouragement.
The characteristics of FOUNDATIONS extended-day curricula: Literature-Based Multicultural Highly Interactive Designed to reinforce academic skills in reading, writing and mathematics Responsive to multiple teaching and learning styles Aligned with national standards Suitable for any setting
Louisiana Division of Administration 82
After-School Enrichment The cost for a K-6 class pack (Includes one manual and a set of approximately 35 literature books for use with a group of 20 ­ 30 pupils) is $610.00 per pack.
The Department of Education has approved 2 packs: Foundations Discovers- Promotes self-esteem, diverse cultures and fine arts through new discoveries.
Foundations Invests- Examines exciting inventions and inventors from around the world.
For more information, please contact: FOUNDATIONS, Inc.
Moorestown West Corporate Center 101 Executive Drive, Suite 2 Moorestown, NJ 08057 888-877-KIDS (5437) Attn.: Malik J. Stewart, ext. 24 Email: malik.stewart@foundations-inc.org
2.
Voyager- Expanded Learning
VOYAGER AFTER SCHOOL Voyager Expanded Learning provides scientifically based, standards driven, high quality extended time learning programs to develop students' academic, social and leadership skills.
The programs are designed to close the achievement gap and ensure that children meet or exceed grade level standards by providing hands-on, collaborative and enriched learning experiences.
The extended-day intervention programs are theme-based, easy to implement and develop and reinforce key academic skills.
The programs are designed to be implemented 4½ to 5 hours each week.
Voyager After School programs provide the following: A research based program with proven results Increased instructional capacity through ongoing professional development Content related literature and instructional materials Comprehensive curriculum guide with daily lesson plans for minimal preparation Targeted assessments that inform instruction Flexibility to address various extended time schedules High attendance due to student engagement and theme-based learning Louisiana Division of Administration 83
After-School Enrichment Skills and objectives aligned with LEAP 21 Reading Intervention Series - Voyager's K-6 Reading Intervention Series is designed for extended day programs that are grade-level specific.
Students develop core-reading skills as they explore science, social studies and literature.
Beginnings ­ Grade 1 Discoveries ­ Grade 2 Wonders ­ Grade 3 Conquests ­ Grade 4 Pursuits ­ Grade 5 Solutions ­ Grade 6 Basic Skills Series - Voyager's K-8 Basic Skills Series is designed for multigrade extended day programs.
Students develop core reading and mathematics skills as they learn about the arts and science.
Mysteries/Kaleidoscope ­ Grades K ­ 3 Mysteries/Kaleidoscope ­ Grades 3-6 American Dream/Media Magic ­ Grades 6-8 The program is $1250 per class (up to 18 students per class).
The cost includes teacher training; comprehensive curriculum guide with daily lesson plans; books, instructional materials, assessments; libraries of leveled texts; suggestions for parent and community involvement, and on-going implementation support for each class.
For additional information, please contact: Steven Reynolds 888-399-1995, ext. 344 www.voyagerlearning.com.
3.
Benchmark
Company's Reading Explorers Tutoring Programs "Pathfinders" for grades K-2 and/or "Trailblazers"--for grades 3-8 Education
The Reading Explorers Tutoring Program is a research-based program designed for parent volunteers, community volunteers, educators or non-educators to successfully tutor at-risk children in grades K-8 one-on-one or in small groups.
The explicit lesson plan consists of a consistent, five-step format that incorporates "best practice" instruction for optimum literacy reinforcement and success.
Time on task is maximized as all program materials are provided.
Louisiana Division of Administration 84
After-School Enrichment
Reading Explorers consists of two separate component parts: Pathfinders - beginning literacy in grades K-3, spans developmental reading levels (DRA) 1-20 Trailblazers - extending literacy in grades 3-8, spans developmental reading levels (DRA) 15-40 Both programs include: Training Tutor Sets for 144 explicit lessons Student Kits for hands-on learning Book sets- fiction and nonfiction titles per lesson Site Coordinator materials Pathfinders Program - $4900 Includes an initial day of training and a follow-up day of coaching, 4 book sets (126 fiction titles for read aloud, 1 copy of each, 
Trailblazers Program - $4500 Includes an initial day of training and a follow-up day of coaching, 4 book sets (72 fiction titles for read aloud, 1 copy of each, and 54 nonfiction leveled texts, 6 copies of each), 3 Tutor Sets (additional sets can be purchased @ $275 each as one set is needed per tutor), 5 Student Kits (additional kits can be purchased @ $30 for each child being serviced), and materials for the site-coordinator.
Note: Programs may be purchased individually or as a complete K-5 or K-8 program.
See brochure and Benchmark Education catalog for more detailed information.
Volume discounts may apply.
For ease in ordering, site-pricing templates are available upon request.
For additional information, please contact: Tom Cowley Louisiana Representative 1-985-370-0929 1-877-236-2465
Louisiana Division of Administration 85
After-School Enrichment Sylvia Rodriquez Benchmark Education Phone: 914-738-6977 Fax: 914-738-5063 E-mail: Benchmked@aol.com
4.
(This is computer-based and will serve in conjunction with one of the textbased curricula, above, for those programs with updated computers)
Fast ForWord- Basics and/or Reading
Scientific Learning Corporation's scientifically proven Fast ForWord learning and reading skill building training programs meet the criteria for the new federal No Child Left Behind education legislation and funding.
Proven results with students nationwide show that the programs rapidly build and improve critical foundational skills for learning and reading that are mandated by the bill phonemic awareness, phonics, fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension.
Featuring CD ROM game exercises, the programs use patented technologies to adapt to each student's skill level, allowing students to make significant gains in the critical foundational skills necessary for academic achievement in as little as 20 to 40 instructional sessions.
Educators can use the company's patented Internet technology, ProgressTracker, to track students' progress on the training programs.
Since the introduction of the first Fast ForWord program, more than 120,000 individuals have participated in the training programs.
The Fast ForWord programs focus on preparing a student to take advantage of good curricula and good instruction in the classroom.
They help prepare a student to benefit from solid direct reading instruction, and they produce rapid and measurable gains in critical reading and learning skills as assessed by state achievement tests, as well as other independent third-party pre-and post-tests.
Approved Products Fast ForWord Basics-software that develops basic learning skills for 4-7 yearolds including color, shape and size identification, event sequencing, letter-name and letter-sound association, initial and final sound identification, and computer mouse skills.
Fast ForWord Reading-training program that rapidly and systematically builds reading skills measured on state assessments including word recognition and fluency, advanced decoding, spelling and vocabulary, and passage comprehension.
Louisiana Division of Administration 86
After-School Enrichment
Summer School Packages Available Early Literacy Package: $2999.00 Targets K-3 learners to build foundational early literacy skills.
Includes 8 Reading Edge CDs, 6 Basics CDs, 10 Bookshelf CDs, 10 Reading CDs, 2 enrollments in Language 
Literacy Package: $4995.00 Targets reading skills that correlate directly to state curriculum standards for Grades 3-8.
Includes 50 Reading CDs.
Single computer sets available at lower prices.
For additional information, please contact: Gigi Poglitsch CCC/SLP 888-665-9707 ext. 8838 More information and outcomes can be viewed at www.scientificlearning.com and www.brainconnection.com
Louisiana Division of Administration 87
After-School Enrichment
55 Nifty Math Problems 1.
I was walking past a garage this morning.
The door was open.
I looked inside and noticed 3 bicycles and 4 tricycles, none of which had tires.
How many tires would have to be bought so that every trike and bike had all of its missing tires? 2.
I have some colored tiles in my hat.
You have colored tiles on a table in front of you.
I'm going to tell you exactly what I have in my hat by giving you clues.
As I give you these clues, reach into your stack and pull out tiles that conform to the hints I give you.
As each new clue comes your way, revise the tiles that you have taken out in front of you to make your selection match the new clue. a.
I have fewer than 10 tiles in my hat. b.
They are of two colors.
c. None are green d. None are red e.
There are twice as many blue tiles as yellow tiles. f.
There are two yellow tiles.
What tiles do I have in my hat? 3.
Eighty-one parents are coming to the school tonight.
Each table we have at school can hold only 6 people.
How many tables do you think we will need so that each parent can sit at a table? 4.
Let's sit in close to the table now, with everyone's feet on the ground under the table.
Without peeking: How many feet do you think are under the table? 5.
How many pockets are in the room today? How do you think we could figure this out while at the same time representing the answer so all could see? 6.
The windows in this building are each 6 feet tall.
How tall is the building itself? Given this, how tall do you think the GEOGRAPHY sign on the top of the building is? [Draw a sketch of multi story building with windows, and a sign on its roof that says GEOGRAPHY] Louisiana Division of Administration 88
After-School Enrichment
7.
Draw what do you think it would look like if you were on the other side of this view?" [Locate a photo of cityscape, or mountain range] 8.
A farmer raises hens and rabbits.
He looks out across his barnyard one foggy morning to see all of his hens and rabbits.
Because it's so foggy he can only see their 10 heads and their 26 feet.
How many rabbits is he looking at? 9.
How many combinations of 3 flavors of ice cream do you think you can create in an ice cream cone format? 10.
Draw these without lifting your pencil or repeating a line: [Make a drawing of a simple peaked house with an X in it.
Make a drawing of 5-pointed Star.]
11.
Seven people approach each other after not having seen each other for some time.
They shake hands in greeting.
How many handshakes do you think would have taken place once every one of the seven had shaken hands once with everyone else? 12.
If I charge one cent an hour on the first 8 hour day; on the next day I charge twice as much each hour; and I continue doubling my hourly charge as the days go by, how much do you think I would be charging each day on the 15th day? 13.
How many times must a string go around your head to be as long as your body? 14.
1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 * 11 What number do you think should appear in the (*) space? x 12 x 13 x 14 x 15 x 16 x 17 Louisiana Division of Administration 89
After-School Enrichment x 18 15.
What's next? Determine the next number in this number series.
10, 30, 90, 270, 810, ____ 16.
If it takes 10 people 10 days to dig a hole, how long do you think it will it take 5 people to dig a hole half the size of the first hole? 17.
Which rolled up container do you think will hold the most beans? The one rolled in picture A, or the one rolled in picture B? [Need to make 2 sketches...one showing a rectangular piece of paper rolled up along its long side.
One showing it rolled up along its short side.]
18.
Locate 25 squares in the following grid.
[Draw a 4" x 4" square box made up of 4 little 1" short lines along each side, and across the mid-line area in both directions] 19.
Race to Twenty: Two people share counting one or two numbers at a time toward 20.
Starting at #1 one person says a number (or two), the other person says the next number (or two) The person who says "20" wins.
Determine the rule for who will always win before 20 is reached.
20.
$1.00 Word Search: If A=1cent, and B=2cents, and C=3cents, etc., find out what your name is worth.
Find a word worth just $1.00.
Share it with the group.
21.
Test your Geometric Memory: On a piece of paper draw each of the following as close to their actual size as possible.
Check your memory against the real objects: A quarter A dollar bill Try this one: "Draw what appears on the `head' side of a penny?"
Louisiana Division of Administration 90
After-School Enrichment
22.
Determine the maximum number of cubes that would be needed for a construction of cubes to look like this from the front: [Make a drawing of 4 squares (cubes), side by side, with 2 squares (cubes), on center, side by side, on top of these 4 squares (cubes)] And like this from one side: [Make a drawing of 4 squares (cubes), side by side, with 2 squares (cubes) on top, one on top of the second square (cube), and one on top of the 4th square (cube).]
Determine the minimum number of cubes needed in order to maintain the "look" in each sketch.
23.
Folding a sheet of paper to match the folds in an accordion.
Lay this the table.
Use a strong lamp to cast a shadow of a hand over the the folded paper.
Without flattening the folds in the paper, carefully outline of the shadow as it appears on the folded paper.
Once don the page to see the result.
down on length of trace the e, flatten
24.
How much time difference will there be between the following two trains if they go along the outside edge of the square they are in? It takes one minute to go along one block on each side of one of the graph squares.
[Make 2 drawings on a piece of 1" graph paper.......
one shows a "3 blocks long" train going the perimeter of an 8" x 8" block square, and one "1+1/2 blocks long" train going along the perimeter of a 4" x 4" block square.]
25.
How could you determine the surface area of a footprint (on paper)? A Matruska Doll? 26.
Draw a profile of a person's head.
Now draw the same profile so that it is half as small as the original.
How could you be sure it's half as small? 27.
If you toss a coin and it comes up "heads," take one step on a diagonal to the left.
If you toss a coin and it comes up "tails," take one step on a diagonal to the right.
What do you think your path would look like after 10 tosses, if you were to draw it? Louisiana Division of Administration 91
After-School Enrichment 28.
I drew stars on a paper one day, and stopped when I had twenty-five 5pointed stars.
How many points did I have altogether when I finished drawing 25 stars? 29.
When standing on a bathroom scale, I find that I weigh 100 pounds.
If I lift one leg off the scale, how much will the scale say I weigh then? If I stand on the scale with a bird in a birdcage in my hand--and the bird is standing on the floor of his cage--will the weight of me, plus the cage, plus the bird change if the bird begins to fly around the cage while I am on the scale? 30.
Two players sit opposite each other at a table.
Between you is a screen so you cannot see what is on the table in front of the player opposite you.
Each player has an identical set of objects to work with.
One player creates a construction with her objects.
That player then describes her construction well enough for the other player to construct a matching construction.
31.
Probability: 1 2 3 4 Ask at least 5 people to circle just one of the numbers in this sequence on their own piece of paper.
Which number do you think will get circled most often? Statistical study of this problem showed that 4 out of 5 people circle number 3.
How many times must you do this study before this statistic comes true for you? 32.
How many stars can you draw in one minute? Does it matter whether you are drawing 5-point or 6-point stars? What can you do to improve the number you can draw in one minute? 33.
Which number is it? One person picks a 2-digit number.
(Both numbers must be different.)
The other person tries to guess the 2-digit number.
For each guess, the first person tells how many digits in the guess are correct and how many of the correct digits are in the correct place.
Example: Guess Digit Place 27 0 0 13 1 1 So, this response (1 and 1) tells the player that one of those digits (1 or 3) is correct, and one of those digits is in the correct place (10' place or 1's place)! Continue playing by next testing whether the 1 or the 3 is the correct number, or in the correct place.
Once done, try guessing the other number.
Louisiana Division of Administration 92
After-School Enrichment 34.
FERMI Questions: Fermi questions are next to impossible to actually solve.
However, you can discuss the process you might use to solve each question if you had to try: · How many balls can you keep in the air at the same time? · How many jellybeans could you hold in both your hands cupped together? · How many steps will it take to cross the room? · How many pieces of popcorn do you get in a large container at the movies? · How many students would fit in this room if we took all the furniture out? · How many inflated basketballs would it take to fill the gymnasium? · How many breaths do you take in a year? · How many sheets of toilet paper would it take to make a stack up to the ceiling? · How many meals would you eat in a typical lifetime? · How many raindrops will it take to fill a cup? · If the total amount of money you earned in your life were given to you at a rate of $10 per hour of your life, how much would your lifetime be worth? · How many words are there in the World Book Encyclopedia? · What is the surface area of the skin of an adult human's body? 35.
Creature Card problems.
See my collection of Creature Cards 36.
Mirror Card Problems.
See my collection of Mirror Cards 37.
Anno's Journey Problems.
Develop these on your own for this wordless book 38.
Look at the following balance beam with a fulcrum in the center.
You can see 8 unifix cubes stacked up on one end of the beam, but you cannot see the other side of the beam.
The beam is level.
Draw all the number of cubes and possible ways the cubes could be arranged on the end you can't see in order to account for the balanced look.
[A sketch is needed which shows a level beam supported by a fulcrum at about the 1/3 point along the beam.]
Louisiana Division of Administration 93
After-School Enrichment 39.
"This Is In and This Is Not": A sorting game.
Using a clothesline, create a 6foot wide circle in the middle of the floor.
Around the outside of the circle, place different kinds of everyday objects.
The game leader thinks of a rule concerning the characteristic (i.e., RED things) that will allow an object to be placed in or excluded from the circle.
The leader writes this rule on a piece of paper turned face down on the floor.
Players start, taking turns.
One player at a time chooses one object he/she thinks will conform to the rule and be allowed inside the circle.
If the object chosen conforms to the attribute the leader had in mind (the rule is "RED" and the object is "red") the object can stay inside the circle.
If it does not conform (the rule is "RED" but the object is "blue"), it must be taken back out of the circle.
All the leader can say is "yes" or "no" in response to an object being placed in the circle.
The players must try to figure out, by looking at the characteristics of the objects that are allowed to remain, what the leader's rule must be.
Guesses will be answered by "yes" or "no" responses.
Once the rule has been guessed, a new leader is chosen, and the new leader comes up with a new rule.
Older children will enjoy a double or triple rule.
Example: "Only green, round, and fuzzy things can stay."
40."Sarah and Josephine".
For older kids: Can you help out? Sarah and Josephine are friends.
Sarah was lucky enough to find a very good job right out of school, but Josephine is still looking for a permanent teaching job.
Right now she has occasional substitute teaching jobs.
While rooming together in an apartment they decide they should split their expenses proportionately until Josephine gets full-time work.
Sarah says that since she is earning three times as much as Josephine right now, Josephine should pay only one fourth of the expenses.
Josephine says, "Hey, I was going to pay one third of the expenses."
Work with others to decide who is right and why.
Use diagrams, concrete objects such as beans, or charts to help you.
Consider drawing a picture that shows the salaries and their relationship to each other.
Be ready to share your reasoning with other groups.
41.
Three Bean Salads.
Use real beans to solve the following problems.
For each salad determine how many of each of the three types of beans are needed.
#1 This salad contains: 2 Lima Beans Twice as many Red Beans as Lima Beans A total of 10 Beans in all.
Louisiana Division of Administration 94
After-School Enrichment #2 This salad contains: 4 Red Beans ½ as many Black Eyed Peas as Red Beans A total of 10 Beans in all.
This salad contains: The same number of Red Beans as Lima Beans 3 more Black Eyed Peas than Red Beans A total of 18 Beans in all.
Lima Beans make up one half of this salad.
The salad has exactly 2 Red Beans.
The number of Lima Beans is double the number of Red Beans.
#3
#4
42.
Refer to the following sketch of windows in a building where you can only see 2 sides of the whole building.
The windows look so worn out! Maybe the owners will want to put in new ones.
They will first need to know how many there are in total--on all four sides of the building! How many do you think they will need to buy? [Needs a 3/4 view sketch of 2 sides of a multi-story building with worn out windows] 43.
I went to the candy shop around the corner with $1.00 in my pocket.
At this candy shop they sell only 4 different kinds of candies: Packs of gum for 25 cents; lollipops for 15 cents; jawbreakers for 10 cents; and kisses for 5 cents.
I left the store with no money and exactly seven candies in a brown bag.
What could be in my bag? 44.
An advertisement for a bookstore in New York City reads as follows: "Largest Used-Book Store in NYC; Over 2 Million Books on 8 Miles of Shelves."
Could there really be 2 million books on 8 miles of shelves? [A Mile is 5,280 feet; A Foot is 12 inches long; A typical book in this shop is 1 inch wide at the spine] 45.
At one table, 6 children shared 5 chocolate bars.
At another table 8 children shared 5 chocolate bars.
At another 6 children shared 4 chocolate bars.
At another table 8 children shared 4 chocolate bars.
At which of the 4 tables do children get to eat the most chocolate?
Louisiana Division of Administration 95
After-School Enrichment 46.
How many average 8 year old children all together weigh as much as a 1,000 pound polar bear? 47.
How many children are needed to make a 110-foot tall pyramid? 48.
I have 12 boxes of pencils with 15 pencils in each box.
How many pencils do I have in all? 49.
I have 5 shirts, and 3 pants.
How many different pants with shirt combinations can I wear? Shirt colors = black, plaid, stripe, white, yellow.
Pants colors = black, blue jean, tan 50.
Study the following picture of a baker looking at his muffin trays.
How many muffins does he now have? How many did he have when all the trays were filled? How many has he sold? [Draw a picture] 51.
(not math) Given the information for what can and cannot be purchased for colors and sizes of this J. Crew sweater, ......Just what is available for purchase? (See a sample J. Crew ad) 52.
(not math) What do the following words have in common? BRAG KEEP POOLS PART REWARD SLEEK GOLF LIVE EMIT GULP DELIVER FLOW MOOD SNAP DIAL STRAP 53.
Write a number between 1 and 10 on a piece of paper.
Add 9 to the number.
Subtract 5.
Add 7.
Subtract 8.
Add 4.
Subtract the original number.
The answer is always 7
Louisiana Division of Administration 96
After-School Enrichment 54.
The Panther, The Chicken, and the Bag of Grain Problem One day a man leaves his island in his rowboat and goes to the market.
Once there he buys a panther, a chicken, and a bag of grain for the chicken to eat.
He carries them back to his boat.
[the one he used to row from the island he lives on] The problem here is he can only fit one of the three things he bought in the boat at a time.
So, the man has to think about what to take and when to take it, and what to leave behind for the next trip.
He realizes that if he takes the panther first, leaving the chicken and the bag of grain behind that the chicken will get into the grain and get sick because he will eat too much grain.
If he takes the bag of grain, the panther might eat the chicken while the man is gone.
So what should he do? Your task is to solve the problem of which purchase to take first, second, and third, so that all of them will survive, long enough to get them to the island in his "One thing at a time" boat.
55.
The Mathematics of Living [Related to looking at everyday life through a mathematical lens, using the language of math to describe what you see]
An Example of This: Your decision to smoke cigarettes from age 13 until you die mathematically looks like this: $300,000 price tag [average] on the life long purchase of cigarettes, with a 3 to 4 year shortening of your lifetime.
Mathematics, calculating, and problem solving, especially for school age children, is often separated from anything personal or real.
Mathematics is really just a specialized language for describing, finding out about, or communicating what is known about the world.
The Mathematics of Living experiences ask students to look at everyday life in general, and articulate what is seen using the language of math.
Perhaps the Math Concepts handout will help remind you of the language and categories of mathematics.
Examples of this follow.
They may seem unfamiliar and silly, but they make the point.
· · · The answer to the questions: "How many Cheerios were in your bowl this morning? How consistent is this number from one day to the other?" The answers to the questions: "How long does it take to eat one bowl of Cheerios? Over a week's time, what is your average eating time?" The answer to this question: "If a 12 oz. tube of toothpaste costs $1.75, how much does one squeeze of toothpaste on your brush each morning cost?" Louisiana Division of Administration 97
After-School Enrichment
PROBLEM: "Walk to the ________________ [choose a convenient location], and return.
Describe that trip as mathematically full as possible."
ANOTHER PROBLEM: "Describe to a partner, using the language of mathematics, one of the 12/02 proposed design concepts for the NYC World Trade Center."
The source of most of these problems is not recallable.
I've been collecting them for years, with never an intention of sharing them, but instead for my use with the various groups of children and youth I interact with in my work.
I would recommend the reader refer to the following sources for more problems once the above have been tried out: · National Center for Research in Mathematics Education and the Freudenthal Institute (Eds.)Mathematics in context: A connected curriculum for grades 5 - 8.
Chicago: Encyclopedia Britannica Educational Corporation.
J.K. Stenmark, V. Thompson, R. Cossey, Family Math, (1986) Available for purchase from, Zephyr Press, 1-800-232-2187.
G.C. Coates, J.K. Stenmark, Family Math for Young Children, (1997) Also available from Zephyr Press.
1-800-232-2187 V. Thompson, K. Mayfield-Ingram, Family Math: The Middle School Years, (1998) Also available from Zephyr Press.
1- 800-232-2187 Burns, Marilyn, Math and Literature (K - 3), Book One and Book Two, Math Solutions Publications, (1992), available from Cuisenaire Company of America, 1-800-237-3142.
· · · ·
Louisiana Division of Administration 98
After-School Enrichment
55 Math Problems Answer Key 1.
Draw a picture to help solve this problem.
3 bicycles with 2 tires each, 3 x 2 = 6 tires; 4 tricycles with 3 tires each, 4 x 3 =12 tires; 12 + 6= 18; 18 tires all together.
2.
Act this problem out or work backwards, 2 yellow tiles, 4 blue tiles.
3.
Draw a picture to help solve this problem.
81/6 = 13.5; 14 tables are needed 4.
Draw a picture or act out this problem to help solve it.
Count the total number of people at the table.
Then multiply that number by 2, (everyone at this table has two feet.)
If the number of people at the table was 6, the number of feet would be 12, (6 x 2 =12.)
5.
Count the number of pant pockets and shirt pockets on each person in the room.
Have each person put one object in each pocket, then count how many objects all together.
6.
You have to estimate or break the building into parts.
There are 10 windows in each column.
Multiply the number of windows by the number of feet in each one, (10 x 6 = 60.)
The building is 60 feet tall.
The sign looks approximately 3 windows tall, so multiply 3x 6=18.
The sign looks approximately 18 feet tall.
7.
Everything would be on the opposite side.
What you saw on the left would now be on the right side.
8.
Guess and test in order to solve this problem.
Draw different combinations of heads and feet until they are all correctly connected.
3 rabbits, each have 4 feet (3x4=12 feet.)
7 hens, each has 2 feet (7x2=14 feet.)
7 hen heads +3 rabbit heads =10 heads, 12 rabbit feet +14 hen feet =26 feet.
He sees 3 rabbits.
9.
6 combinations of ice cream flavors.
Pretend you have chocolate (c), strawberry (s), and vanilla (v), you could arrange the following combinations starting from top to bottom: csv, cvs, svc, scv, vsc, vcs. 10.
Guess and test until you have draw the objects correctly.
Make sure that you do not lift your pencil when drawing these objects.
For the house with the x inside, begin with one of the lines of the x, and you should be able to draw the house successfully.
Draw the house with a square shape at the Louisiana Division of Administration 99
After-School Enrichment bottom and a triangle at the top.
The x should be inside the square.
For the star, first make an inverted v, then make an upward-sloping diagonal line to the left, followed by a horizontal line to the right, then finally make one last diagonal line, downward sloping to the left.
11.
Act this problem out to solve.
There are 21 handshakes.
If I am one of the seven people, I will make six handshakes, because of course I do not shake my own hand.
The second person in turn will make five new handshakes, because we do not count the handshake he or she has already made with me.
The third person generates four new handshakes, since we do not count the handshake with me and the handshake with the second person.
It continues in this fashion until we have 0 new handshakes.
(6 +5+4+3+2+1+0 = 21) 12.
$163.84.
Continue multiplying the current number by 2 (.01 x 2 = .02; .02 x 2 =.04; .04 x 2=.08; .08 x 2= .16, etc.) 13.
You must first measure the circumference (the distance around your head) of your head, and the length of your body from head to toe.
(Use the same units, such as inches, for both calculations.)
Then divide the length of your body by the width of your head, and that is how many times the string must go around your head.
For example, if your head is 20 inches and your body is 60 inches, the string must go around your head 3 times, (60/20 = 3.)
14.
Look for the pattern in this problem.
The answer is 36.
All the numbers in the pattern are increasing by one each time.
If we count upwards after 19, the number 36 should replace the star.
15.
Look for the pattern in this problem.
The answer is 2430.
Each number after 10 is being multiplied by 3, multiply 810x 3 = 2430.
16.
10 days.
If it takes 10 people 10 days to dig a hole, it would take 10 people 5 days to dig a hole half that size.
Half as many people, five, would then take twice the amount of time to dig that same hole.
(5x2=10.)
17.
Get two containers similar to those in the picture and act it out.
In the picture the containers would most likely hold the same amount of beans.
Although container A is taller, container B is wider, so they would most likely be able to hold an equal amount.
18.
Break the grid into smaller pieces to help solve the problem.
The entire grid counts as 1 square.
There are then 16 small individual squares inside.
Medium size squares made up of 4 small squares can make the additional 7 squares for the total of 25.
Louisiana Division of Administration 100
After-School Enrichment
19.
Act this problem out.
First person Second person or First person Second person 1 2 1,2 3,4 3 4 5,6 7,8 5 6 9,10 11,12 7 8 13,14 15,16 9 10 17,18 19,20 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 The second person always wins, when it's done these ways.
However, if the guessing goes like this, the first person would win 1 2,3 4,5 6 7 8,9 10,11 12 13 14,15 16 7,18 19,20............
In conclusion, the idea is to be the person who controls the saying of the last few numbers.
20.
Break the problem into separate steps.
Step 1 - Figure out the cents value of all 26 letters: A=1, B=2, C=3, D=4, E=5, F=6, G=7, H=8, I=9, J=10, K=11, L=12, M=13, N=14, O=15, P=16, Q=17, R=18, S=19, T=20, U=21, V=22, W=23, X=24, Y=25, Z=26.
Step 2 - Identify the value of all the letters in your name.
Step 3 - Add the values together to get the value of your name.
Example name: ANN, A=1, N=14, N=14;......
1+14+14=29.
ANN is worth 29 cents.
21.
Draw these objects on a piece of paper, then compare the size of the actual objects with the size of your drawings.
22.
The maximum number of cubes needed is 20 and the minimum number of cubes needed is 6.
23.
Draw two distinctly different shadows, and then identify which objects are making each of the two shadows, for example, two people talking, and a zebra grazing.
Louisiana Division of Administration 101
After-School Enrichment 24.
The longer train will take 2 minutes and 40 seconds to go from one end of the grid to the other.
The smaller train will take 5 minutes and 20 seconds.
The difference in time between the two trains is 2 minutes and 40 seconds.
25.
Answers will vary according to the differences in foot and doll size.
You could lay a transparent grid with equal-sized squares over the footprint.
Each square would represent some standard numeric unit.
You would then count the number of squares that overlap the footprint.
You would multiply this number by the number of units they represent.
For example if each square represented 2 cm^2, and the footprint contained 60 squares, the surface area would be 120 cm^2, (60 x 2= 120.)
For the doll, one would need to wrap it tightly in a long string.
Then unwrap it and lay the string down to make a 2 dimensional shape, (rectangle.)
Then multiply the length of the rectangle by the width to get the surface area.
(If the length is 8 cm and the width is 10 cm, the surface area would be 80 cm^2, 8 x 10 = 80.)
26.
Draw the person's profile, and then try to draw it exactly the same but half the size.
27.
Answers will vary according to the order in which you flip heads and tails.
If you assume that you flip heads, then tails, then heads, then tails, etc. for 10 flips, your pattern would be a zigzag line starting to the left and ending to the right.
View this pattern vertically: /\/\/\/\/\ 28.
125 points.
(25 stars times 5 points, 25x5=125.)
29.
If you lean onto the leg that is off the scale, your weight would be the same as when both feet are on the scale.
If you keep your leg straight up in the air, raising up your thigh closer to your chest, your weight will appear the same.
If the bird begins to fly around in the cage, the weight will be your weight plus the weight of the cage, minus the weight of the bird, since the bird is not applying pressure to you or the cage.
30.
Guess and test to solve this problem.
When making your construction, use common geometric shapes such as triangles, squares, rectangles, and circles, and 3 or 4 different colors, such as red, green, blue, and yellow.
31.
This statistic will never come true, due to the laws of probability.
Each number, 1, 2, 3, and 4, have an equal chance of being circled.
Thus each number has a 25% chance of being circled.
The only way the statistic in the problem would come true would be if people were more likely to circle 3 than the other numbers, due to some psychological factor.
Louisiana Division of Administration 102
After-School Enrichment 32.
Five pointed stars take less time to draw.
In order to maximize the number of stars that you can draw in one minute, draw all 5 pointed stars.
33.
Guess and test until you come up with the right number.
Pretend that the number is 32.
If you guess 24, one of the digits is correct, but none of the places are correct.
If you guess 42, one of the digits is correct and one of the places is correct.
Make sure not to tell which digit is correct, just how many digits are correct.
34.
Just estimate, since there is no right or wrong answer to these kinds of questions.
35.
See the collection of Creature Cards.
36.
See the collection of Mirror Cards.
37.
Develop these for this wordless book.
38.
Guess and test to determine which ways you can balance the fulcrum.
You can arrange the cubes in any manner you desire, as long as, there are exactly eight cubes on both sides.
This is the only way to balance the fulcrum.
39.
Everyday objects can be used for this game.
The object is to strengthen knowledge of adjectives and to compare and contrast different objects.
Characteristics can include things such as color, texture, use, etc. 40.
Josephine should only pay 1/4 of the expenses.
For example, suppose Sarah makes $12.
She earns three times as much as Josephine, so Josephine earns $4.
(4 x 3 = 12.)
Together they make $16.
Sarah pays for 3/4 of the expenses (12/16 = 3/4,) while Josephine pays for 1/4 (4/16 = 1/4.)
41.
A. 2 Lima beans, 4 Red beans, and 4 Black-eyed peas.
(Starting with 2 Lima beans.
Twice as many Red beans as Lima beans = 2 x 2= 4.
Total of 10, 2 Lima beans, 4 Red beans, 2+4 = 6.
10 - 6 =4.
4 Black eyed peas.)
B. Red beans, 2 Black-eyed peas, 4 Lima beans.
(4 Red beans are given.
1/2 as many Black-eyed peas as Red beans = 4/2 = 2.
Total of 10.
4 Red beans + 2 Black-eyed peas = 6.
10-6=4 Lima beans.
C. 5 Red beans, 5 Lima beans, and 8 Black-eyed peas.
(Same number of Red beans as Lima beans.
3 more Black-eyed peas than Red beans.
Total of 18.
5 Lima beans + 5 Red beans + 8 Black-eyed peas = 18.)
D. 2 Red beans, 4 Lima beans, 2 Black-eyed peas.
(2 Red beans, Lima beans are double the number of Red beans, 2 x 2=4 Lima beans.
Lima beans are 1/2 of total.
4/8 = 1/2.
Total of 8 beans.
2 Red beans + 4 Lima beans =6.
8-6=2.
2 Black-eyed peas.)
Louisiana Division of Administration 103
After-School Enrichment 42.
You can only see one side of this 4-sided building.
You need to assume that each of the other 3 sides look like the one you can see to solve this problem.
There are approximately 900 windows total.
Subtract the number of windows that need to be replaced from the total of 900.
43.
Answers will vary.
Some possible answers could be 10 jawbreakers; 20 kisses; 4 packs of gum; 5 lollipops and 1 pack of gum; 6 lollipops and 1 jawbreaker.
44.
Have children explain his or her reasoning behind their answer.
The length of the shelves must be 46550 feet.
If each shelf was 4 feet long, and had three separate rows, and each book was 1 inch thick, there would be 144 books per shelf.
(4 feet x 3 rows = 12 feet.
12 inches in each foot = 12 books in each foot; 12 x 12 = 144 books.)
In this case there would be a total of 11640 shelves, 46550 feet total / 4 foot shelves = 11640.
There would be a total of 1,676,160 books, because 11640 shelves x 144 books each = 1,676,160.
So the answer to the problem would be no since 1,676,160 is less than 2 million.
If the shelves each had 6 different rows, there would be 288 books per shelf, 6 rows x 4 feet = 24 feet.
24 feet x 12 inches = 288, since each book is one inch thick.
There would be 3,352,320 books total since there are 11640 shelves x 288 books each = 3,352,320.
The answer would then be yes because 3,352,320 is greater than 2 million.
45.
The children get to eat the most chocolate at the table with 6 children and 5 bars, since they all get close to one whole bar.
46.
Answers will vary.
If you assume each child weighs 50 pounds, then 20 children will weigh as much as the 1000 pound polar bear.
47.
Answers will vary.
If you assume each child is 4 feet tall, then 27.5 children will be needed to make the 110-foot pyramid.
48.
180 pencils.
(15 x 12 = 180.)
49.
15 different outfits.
(5 x 3 = 15.) Make paper cut outs of the different shirts and pants to match each color.
Mix and match the pants with the shirts until all combinations have been made.
50.
The baker has 72 muffins now.
When all the trays were full he had 120 (40 x 3 = 120.)
He has sold 48 muffins (120 - 72 = 48.)
51.
Answer depends on the catalog item chosen.
52.
The letters for each word can be reordered to make a new word.
Louisiana Division of Administration 104
After-School Enrichment
53.
The Secret.....the original number is canceled out at the end when you subtract in the final step.
54.
The Panther, The Chicken, and the Bag of Grain Problem: Take the chicken in the boat first, (panthers don't eat grain.)
Drop the chicken off at the island.
Row back to the mainland.
Take the panther in the boat next, leaving the bag of grain till last.
Once you get to the island, drop the panther off, but pick up the chicken again.
Put the chicken back in the boat and row back to the mainland.
Pick up the bag of grain.
Drop the chicken off at the mainland.
Take the grain to the island and drop it off, leaving the chicken behind.
Row back alone to pick up the chicken again, and bring it back to the island.
55.
There are too many possible variations of answers to both of these problems.
Each variant would be an acceptable answer, though the best answers might be very "mathematical language full".
Louisiana Division of Administration 105
After-School Enrichment
Fifty Nifty Literacy Activities Literacy Activities in the context of Non-School Time Supporting Literacy development in a non-school setting will look different than the more familiar "Language Arts, Reading, and Literacy" periods that schools create as they teach reading, and writing to students.
That should not be taken as meaning that supporting literacy development is not intentional, planned, or formalized somehow.
It is.
All of us who spend time with children and youth have an important role to play in modeling literacy, expecting literate responses by others, and provoking or encouraging the development and expansion of children's and youths' abilities to read, write, and speak.
Any opportunity, planned or not, to model, inform, correct, suggest, encourage, provoke, or challenge language use and learning should always be grasped by adults who want to take an active role in fostering children's literacy development.
Think of the times, when you were a kid, a well intentioned adult challenged something you said, and suggested alternative words or phrases for you to use; times when an adult read out loud from a book just to pass the time; or wanting to participate in delicious, interesting games or activities, but participation required you to carefully read, write, or speak something.
Your own literacy development is due in part to your having been a part of these occurrences.
The Fifty-Nifty Literacy Activities which follow were written to "fit" into after school programs without necessarily setting up a "literacy time" to do them.
Most of them are done in association with the everyday kind of activities one thinks of when they think "out-of-school time".
They add to, supplement, or extend typical after school activities.
Some of them, however, can be done as "stand alone" activities, not connected to another activity.
Do them because you think they might be fun to try out as new choices for children and youth to make.
Mystery Boxes (placed on the sign-in counter); Who Am I or Wanted Posters (hung up in the hallways); or Shiny, Tiny, Straight and Crooked (done in the Art Room); Stone Soup (the snack for the day) are examples of activities that stand alone, don't compromise an existing program, and support kid's literacy development.
Louisiana Division of Administration 106
After-School Enrichment
To Get TALKING Happening 1.
Have a Discussion on a Topic of Significance ­ Sit in a circle and set
rules for how to discuss the topic (e.g., listen while someone is speaking, raise your hand to signal your willingness to speak, agree that it's okay to disagree if done politely, the discussion leader is _____). object that inspire kids to guess about it.
Reinforce ideas when they might lead the kids to the answer.
Do this in a discussion format.
Mystery object should be relevant to program (i.e., a basketball associated with an upcoming tournament/game).
2.
Mystery Box ­ Place an object inside a "Mystery Box."
Give clues about the
3.
Interest Tables ­ This is similar to "Mystery Boxes," but the object is to be
looked at, touched, and discussed.
Examples include historical artifacts, bones, novel foods, and curious animals.
photographs, charts, maps, posters, or information that is connected to a relevant theme of interest to the children.
4.
Displays ­ Create displays on the walls or on a table.
Talk about objects,
5.
Round Robin Story Telling ­ Sit in a circle and have children, taking turns
around the circle, construct or tell a story.
The story can start with, "Once upon a time, at the ______ after school program, a huge, green alligator walked through the door."
The second person in the circle constructs the next line in the story, and so on.
The last person in the circle must somehow finish the story.
You can also do this using a real story about the actual program.
It might start, "Yesterday, ______ got hurt on the playground.
Here is how it happened.
First, ..."
The unfolding of the event passes to the person in the circle who thinks s/he knows the earliest piece of the story of how ______ injured him/herself. commercial to inspire others to go on the same trip.
6.
Field Trip Commercial ­ After a field trip, the trippers create and present a
7.
Instructions ­ Encourage one child to instruct another on how to do
something.
8.
Tonight's News ­ Turn any story into a news broadcast for television
viewing.
9.
Interviews ­ Use a video camera to interview someone in your program
who has accomplished something significant (like interviewers do in sports programming).
For example, start an interview by saying, "Good afternoon
Louisiana Division of Administration 107
After-School Enrichment boys and girls.
We are fortunate to have ______ with us today.
______ just broke his own record of the numbers of times he can glide across the gym on his mini skateboard in 5 minutes.
Tell us, ______, how did you do it?" 10.
Mystery Story ­ Develop a mystery story that ends with, "There she lay,
still as death, at the foot of the stairs" (or another mysterious line).
To Get WRITING Happening 11.
Personal Journals ­ Journals, similar to diaries, are places for kids to write
anything important that they want to access at a later date.
Journals can be used for kids to record important events, swimming records, basketball successes, crafts ideas, or personal gains of any sort.
Have kids make their own homemade journals, or use store-bought blank books.
something gets kids to use the tools and muscle groups needed for original writing experiences.
Do not hesitate to encourage this kind of copying.
12.
Tracing or Copying ­ Even though it's unoriginal, tracing or copying
13.
Labeling ­ Ask kids to label their own coat hooks, books, backpacks, or
snack bags.
Also, create labels for materials around the room.
14.
Ballot Box ­ Ask kids to write their ideas for the Mystery Box, Interest
Table, or Display (described above) on slips of paper and put them into a ballot box.
Displays can also ask kids to fill out opinion pages.
writing process.
15.
Word Processing Programs in Technology Centers really streamline the
16.
Drawing ­ Drawing is a preliminary activity to writing; the same muscle
groups that are used in writing are developed when drawing.
Encourage kids to draw what they see (e.g., when going on a field trip to look at flowers).
17.
Label Photographs ­ After a field trip, make a photo album of the trip.
Each photo must have a written label that explains who and/or what the viewer is looking at.
the story is written over time.
Each child writes his/her version of an event and pastes it in a storybook about that event.
18.
Round Robin Story Writing ­ This is similar to story telling, only this time
Louisiana Division of Administration 108
After-School Enrichment 19.
Invent Solutions ­ Invent solutions to storybook problems.
For example,
in the book, Why Mosquitoes Buzz in People's Ears, children can draw inventive ways to prevent mosquitoes from buzzing in people's ears.
To Get READING Happening 20.
Round Robin Story Reading ­ This is similar to Round Robin storytelling
and writing.
One child reads part of a story and then passes the book on to another child to continue.
out each character in the story as best they can.
21.
Act Out Character Parts ­ After reading a book, ask kids to read and act
22.
Cookbook and "Make and Take" Activities ­ Have kids read about
something they can make to eat or something they can make from directions in a book.
Then follow the directions and make it! order to tell a story about the events depicted in the pictures.
23.
Storytelling with Wordless Books ­ Here the kids "read" the pictures in
24.
Daily Problem ­ Each day, post a problem for the day.
This problem can
be a simple math problem that can be solved by drawing pictures, acting out a problem, or making a model of the problem.
should be a word that is somehow associated with the program (e.g., pool, clubhouse, a favored leader's name).
Write each word on two cards.
Make a collection of paired word cards that includes at least 20 words (40 cards).
Shuffle the cards, and lay them face down on the tabletop.
Taking turns, each player turns over two cards, hoping each time to turn up a second card that matches the first card.
If there is a match, the player removes the matched pair from the other cards.
If the cards do not match, the player turns the cards back down.
25.
Concentration Game ­ Write words on playing card size cards.
The word
Additional Literacy Activities that Promote TALKING, WRITING, and READING 26.
Personal Symbols ­ Design a symbol that represents you.
Use this symbol to label your work and belongings.
27.
Crossword Puzzles ­ Make up puzzles that use words and definitions that
are familiar to your program.
28.
Different Languages ­ Speak, read, and write familiar phrases (e.g., hello,
good-bye, welcome, friend, thank you, etc.) in many different languages.
Louisiana Division of Administration 109
After-School Enrichment
29.
Commercials for Favorite Books ­ Have kids design and present a
commercial for others in an attempt to convince other people to read a particular book.
30.
Map Making ­ Some stories (e.g., Paddle to The Sea, Little Red Riding
Hood) feature main characters that move across the countryside.
Use the story and text to develop and paint a mural of the story map.
31.
Wanted Posters ­ Children make up "Wanted Posters" that staff can use to
remind children when they are needed to help, deserve to be congratulated on a good job, or should be honored because it is their birthday.
at the program entrance.
This poster describes one child/youth in the program.
The task is for others to try to figure out who is being described that day.
Kids write their ideas on a piece of paper and place it in a ballot box.
32.
Who Am I? Posters ­ Each day a poster describing one individual is posted
33.
Who Am I? Clue Countdown ­ Individual characteristics of one child are
written down on separate cards and placed in a pile.
Reading one clue card at a time, the reader attempts to figure out who is being described.
Each card is worth one point.
The challenge is to guess who the clues describe using as few cards as possible.
The person who guesses who it is in the fewest cards (and therefore gets the lowest score) wins.
only this activity gives clues (one at a time) to a story that was recently read.
34.
Story Clue Countdown ­ This is similar to the countdown game above,
35.
Twenty Questions ­ This is similar to Story Clues, only the players ask
questions that can be answered by a simple "YES" or "NO".
Players try to guess the story by asking the fewest questions (and, at the most, twenty questions). substitutes false statements for true events in the story.
(For example, "Jacob ate walnuts," when he really ate peanuts.)
Kids try to catch the storyteller in each "lie."
36.
Telling "Lies" ­ A leader relates a favored story to a group of children but
37.
Character Perspectives ­ Tell a story again from another character's point
of view.
For example, tell the story of Little Red Riding Hood from the Wolf's point of view.
Louisiana Division of Administration 110
After-School Enrichment 38.
"Imagine You are a Streetlamp" Drama ­ Describe what you see from
your point of view as a streetlamp.
Tell us about the people who pass you by.
How do dogs treat you? What do you wish people did NOT do to you? How do you know when to turn your lamp on at night? Tell us about something you witnessed one night.
How could you test to discover whether or not your object is truly magic? Suppose it does bad magic ... how could you reverse it?
39.
"Magic Object" Drama ­ Suppose you found a magic object.
What is it?
40.
Reader's Theater ­ This is a form of dramatic presentation in which the
actors sit or stand in a group and read their parts directly from a script or from the storybook itself.
There is no requirement to move about the stage or to memorize lines.
41.
What Do I See? ­ Two players sit opposite each other with a wall of some
sort built between them so that they cannot see what is on the table in front of the other player.
One player builds a small construction of colored blocks in front of herself.
The other player has a similar set of blocks.
The first player must describe her block construction so well that the listening player can build a matching construction using only the first player's word descriptions.
42.
In the Style Of ...
­ Book Illustrators such as Leo Lionni, Ezra Jack Keats,
and Eric Carle all use illustration techniques that are very reproducible.
Many use old wallpaper, ripped construction paper, painted doilies, or scraps of textured cloth to make the illustrations that accompany the story.
Try using similar techniques to make your own versions of each illustration.
43.
Shiny, Tiny, Straight, and Crooked ­ Make a big book version of a book
that fits this title.
Cut pictures from magazines, or draw and paint your own illustrations.
soldiers outwit the greedy townspeople into providing everyone with a feast.
Follow the story, and have the kids make "Stone Soup" for their program snack.
painted and decorative eggs.
In the style of Rechenka's eggs, have kids paint their own eggs.
44.
Stone Soup ­ Stone Soup, by Marcia Brown, is a tale of how 3 hungry
45.
Rechenka's Eggs ­ Rechenka's Eggs, by Patricia Polaco, tells of beautifully
Louisiana Division of Administration 111
After-School Enrichment 46.
Quilt Making ­ Tar Beach, by Faith Ringgold, is a book about making quilts.
The back of the book has directions for making and decorating quilts with kids.
Make a quilt for your program.
47.
Recreate People ­ People, by Peter Spier, is a book written for young
children that contains many outdated images of people from all over the world.
Some of the drawings, images, and text might even be considered offensive to some.
Discuss these images with children and youth, and together, begin to revise this book.
group of players and chooses one characteristic (e.g., wears blue jeans, has brown hair, wears a watch, etc.) that will define who can and cannot be in his/her group.
The leader chooses one individual who matches the characteristic to stand beside him/her.
Based on that choice, the players can guess 3 times to determine the characteristic the leader is looking for.
If the players do not guess correctly, the leader chooses a second person that matches the characteristic he/she is looking for.
Players continue to guess until they figure out the correct characteristic.
The leader may give hints.
interesting and varied sounds are likely to be heard.
Turn the tape recorder on for about a half-hour.
After recording, play the tape and have kids try to identify each sound as they listen.
48.
Guess My Rule ­ Select one leader of the group.
The leader faces a small
49.
Recording Sounds ­ Place a tape recorder in a part of the building where
50.
50 Observations ­ During the day, make a list of 50 different things you
observed that you thought were interesting.
observations, create a story.
Using your favorite
Louisiana Division of Administration 112
After-School Enrichment
Bright Ideas for Dull Moments (Curriculum for K - 4th grade) Rethink the Obvious Introduce something new to the dramatic play area (a castle, a spaceship, hospital, pirate ship, a restaurant, an office) Go camping on the playground or in the classroom Sidewalk chalk drawing Have a carnival Play BINGO for stickers or recycled treasures Use water in the sandbox Have snack outside Sponsor Olympics for the entire program (including teachers) Construct an obstacle course Water balloons
Learn Something New Make paper Model building New games Create a mobile Finger weaving Woodworking, making simple games Spy craft (secret codes, invisible ink, disguises) Magic tricks Map making and compass skills Ice Skating Tie-dye and batik Microwave cooking Cake decorating Baton twirling
Run a Contest Comic strip contest Relay races Design the pumpkin face for Halloween Costume parade Art show Staff created Trivial Pursuit, with facts taken from child's own environment Louisiana Division of Administration 113
After-School Enrichment Treasure hunt with written clues Hobbies show, or treasured object show CAUTION...HAVE AN ACKNOWLEDGMENT FOR EACH CHILD; IT SHOULD BE VERY HARD TO LOSE!
Puzzles Jig-saw puzzles with a group Child created puzzles
Science Magnets, magnifiers, compass, globe, scales, egg timer, prisms, old things to take apart Bug collecting houses and a center BUG JOURNAL to record finds Simple science experiments Many resource books Bird feeder and bird identification chart
Fine Motor Development LEGO, school sets with people and wheels, and staff trained in its use Lincoln logs Tinker toys Pegs, peg boards and ego boards Erector sets Constructs Marble runs Blocks with small cars, dinosaurs, dolls, small furniture Simple race car sets Magnetic shapes to build with
Active Outdoor Play A playground Balls, bats, tee, playground balls Skates: ice and roller Croquet and bocce Street hockey Bikes, wagons and big wheels Plastic sleds and snow tubes Skateboards and scooters Louisiana Division of Administration 114
After-School Enrichment Sand toys Stilts Shuffle board and ring toss Tent Blankets 4 Square Hula Hoops Large jump ropes Plastic cones Bases Kites
Write Something Letter to family or friends Stories, jokes and poems kept in a program notebook
Read a Book Have a quiet area for reading Always have a new collection of picture books on hand and children's magazines Let children have permission to look at staff idea books...they can get ideas too! Bring in toy and equipment catalogues for children and have them add to a posted "wish list"
Music and Sound Allow children to use tape recorders, record players, and radio with supervision Plan for singing opportunities (pretend campfires are great in the winter) Have them invent their own instruments
Drawing and Design Have a mirror ready for self-portraits Allow children to use elaborate face painting ideas Have available: pencils, scissors, tape, glue, hole punchers, brass paper fasteners, scrap paper of different textures, pencil sharpeners, erasers, crayons, CRAYPAS, waste baskets, templates, rulers, carbon paper and staplers Louisiana Division of Administration 115
After-School Enrichment Collage materials Plasticine Play dough Chalk Popsicle sticks Yarn, string, ribbon, sequins, glitter, beads (with supervision) Present new ideas for line drawing using different size paper Blocks...have them design a structure first, then build it
Entertainment Talent shows with teacher and child/family acts Jokes and riddle time Stories at snack time Rent a VCR and serve popcorn
Games Have on hand child created games Some popular games are Uno, checkers, chess, Sorry, Jr.
Scrabble, Old Maid, Othello, Trouble, Monopoly, Clue, Battleship, various memory games, Tiddley Winks, Pictionary, Candyland, regular playing cards, Connect Four...check the wish list
Copyright by Diane M. Genco.
All rights reserved.
No part of this publication may be reproduced, translated or transmitted in any form or by any means without express permission from Diane Genco, PO Box 2985, Westfield, NJ 07901.
Louisiana Division of Administration 116
After-School Enrichment
Bright Ideas for Dull Moments (Curriculum for 5th - 8th grade)
Rethink the Obvious Hide and Seek in the building A party - pick a theme, work all week on it Water table with advanced bubble making Invite a friend to visit for the day Try a sport that involves 2 (ping-pong, roller skating) Ask someone different to play a board game
Learn Something New Sewing, knitting (sweatbands and wristbands) Needlepoint, counted cross stitch First-aid Modeling, makeup, nail care, braiding hair and hair care Martial arts Foreign language Cooking with a theme Bike care and racing Astrology Jewelry design, bead craft
Run a Contest Scavenger hunt (pair older children with younger ones) Obstacle course for skateboard, bikers, relay teams Tournaments (chess/checkers, puzzles, badminton, ping pong, limbo, hula hoop, table soccer) "Slow race" - winner is last biker to cross the line without falling off Game shows (great entertainment at snack time) LEGO design competition
Write Something A letter to a pen pal Create a newspaper A poem Louisiana Division of Administration 117
After-School Enrichment Fan letters Enter a contest
Read a Book Maintain a peer lending library
Music and Sound Vote on top ten songs each week Have a tape library of current songs Use sound effects and tape a radio play Run your own radio shows Learn MOUTHSOUNDS Perfect lip-synching of popular songs
Drawing and Design Calligraphy Maze design Optical illusions Computer graphics Spin art with an old record player Cartooning Paper airplane design Develop board games Use of professional templates Individual sketch pads Stenciling note cards, T-shirts Painting (watercolor) Race track and cars Figure drawing Self-portrait
Entertainment Magic shows for younger children Puppet shows, visit pre-school centers Talent shows ("Gong Show" style) Video creations Hand shadows Old fashioned parlor games Louisiana Division of Administration 118
After-School Enrichment
Field Trips and Community Activities Bowling Work sites Visit area non-profit institutions Local high-school and college athletic games County parks have Junior Ranger programs to train young adults in natural science Historical sites and museums Historical restoration projects sometimes need volunteers
Job Training Train how to do trim painting Newspaper delivery Child care courses with Red Cross training for boys and girls Pet care IMPORTANT - TRAIN HOW TO KEEP RECORDS, DRAW UP A SIMPLE CONTRACT, ADVERTISING, BUSINESS CARDS, PROVIDE A CERTIFICATE OF TRAINING COMPLETION AND MAINTAIN A JOB REFERRAL SERVICE
Special Privileges Phone answering and taking messages Select films Use of special tools and equipment Run a Trading Post for peers to trade baseball cards, jewelry, clothes...
Help to plan menu and activities for the month Occasional use of phone for personal calls Training to use public transportation Member of advisory board to let staff and board hear their voices
Fundraising Cook a meal to serve families at pick-up time at center Neighborhood lawn care Car-wash Design a center calendar with school closings listed Raffle Louisiana Division of Administration 119
After-School Enrichment School supply shop before and after school, selling pencils, pens, erasers...
In warm weather sell ice cream outside of school IMPORTANT - LET THE KIDS KEEP TRACK OF EXPENSES AND ALLOW THEM TO DECIDE HOW TO SPEND THE MONEY EARNED!!!
Copyright by Diane M. Genco.
All rights reserved.
No part of this publication may be reproduced, translated or transmitted in any form or by any means without express permission from Diane Genco, PO Box 2985, Westfield, NJ 07901.
Louisiana Division of Administration 120
After-School Enrichment
Healthy Snack Ideas
Louisiana Division of Administration 121
After-School Enrichment
Sample Participant Satisfaction Survey for Children 1.
Do you like being here? _____ Always _____ Sometimes _____ No If you _____ _____ _____ have a problem at the program, will someone help you? Always Sometimes No
2.
3.
What activities would you like to add to the program? ___________________________________________________ ___________________________________________________ ___________________________________________________ ___________________________________________________ What are the three things you like best about the program? ___________________________________________________ ___________________________________________________ ___________________________________________________ ___________________________________________________ If you could change anything about the program, what would it be? And why would you change it? ___________________________________________________ ___________________________________________________ ___________________________________________________ ___________________________________________________ What grade are you in? ___________________________
4.
5.
6.
Louisiana Division of Administration 122
After-School Enrichment
Sample Participant Satisfaction Survey for Parents 1.
Does your child enjoy his or her time at the program? _____ Always _____ Sometimes _____ No Does the staff respond to your needs and questions in a timely and professional manner? _____ Always _____ Sometimes _____ No Do you feel that your children are supervised so as to protect them from physical and emotional harm? _____ Always _____ Sometimes _____ No What are the three things you like most about the program? ___________________________________________________ ___________________________________________________ ___________________________________________________ ___________________________________________________ If you could change anything about the program what would it be? And why would you change it? ___________________________________________________ ___________________________________________________ ___________________________________________________ ___________________________________________________ How many children do you have involved in the program? What are their ages? __________________________________ ___________________________________________________ Louisiana Division of Administration 123
2.
3.
4.
5.
6.
After-School Enrichment
Sample Participant Satisfaction Survey for Staff 1.
Do you agree with the mission and goals of the program? ___________________________________________________ ___________________________________________________ ___________________________________________________ Are you proud to be associated with this after school program? ___________________________________________________ ___________________________________________________ ___________________________________________________ Do you feel as if the director respects your opinion and is receptive to your ideas? _______________________________ ___________________________________________________ ___________________________________________________ ___________________________________________________ Do you feel as if the staff works well together? _____________ ___________________________________________________ ___________________________________________________ ___________________________________________________ What are the three things you like most about the program? ___________________________________________________ ___________________________________________________ ___________________________________________________ ___________________________________________________ If you could change anything about the program, what would it be? And why would you change it? ______________________ ___________________________________________________ ___________________________________________________ ___________________________________________________
2.
3.
4.
5.
6.
Louisiana Division of Administration 124
After-School Enrichment
Louisiana Department of Education SELF ASSESSMENT MONITORING (SAM) TOOL For After School Programs DIRECTIONS: Please provide as much i and others assess your program.
After co the first two pages, rate each question by represents your after school program and at the bottom of pages 3-10.
nformation as you can to help yourself mpleting the "short answer" section on checking the box that most accurately staff.
The key for Questions 12 ­ 68 is
Name of Program __________________________________________________ Name of Assessor __________________________________________________
ADMINISTRATION 1.
Number of children enrolled ____ Paid Tutors ______ Volunteers_______ Certified Teachers _____ Administrators ________
2.
What is the percentage of enrolled children who attend regularly? _______(%)
[Divide number of children attending on a regular basis by the number of children enrolled.]
3.
What do administrators do when the program is in session? _______________________________________________________________ _______________________________________________________________ _______________________________________________________________ _______________________________________________________________ 4.
How are parents involved? _______________________________________________________________ _______________________________________________________________ _______________________________________________________________ _______________________________________________________________ 5.
How does staff communicate with parents? _______________________________________________________________ _______________________________________________________________ _______________________________________________________________
Louisiana Division of Administration 125
After-School Enrichment 6.
How does staff communicate with the children's schools? _________________________________________________________________ _________________________________________________________________ _________________________________________________________________ _________________________________________________________________ 6.
What is the maximum staff-child ratio for any activity? Staff ____: ____ Children
[NSACA Standards recommend the following for children ages 6 and older: 1:10 ­ 1:15; for children under 6 and with special needs: 1:8 ­ 1:12]
Comments:________________________________________________________ _________________________________________________________________ _________________________________________________________________ 8.
What orientation and regular staff training is mandated and/or offered? _________________________________________________________________ _________________________________________________________________ _________________________________________________________________ _________________________________________________________________ 9.
What requirements or credentials are required of: a.
Tutors:__________________________________________________ ________________________________________________________ ________________________________________________________ b. Teachers:________________________________________________ ________________________________________________________ ________________________________________________________ c.
Other staff: ________________________________________________________ ________________________________________________________ 10.
How are children transported to and from the site? _________________________________________________________________ _________________________________________________________________ _________________________________________________________________ _________________________________________________________________ 11.
How do administrators receive feedback from staff and parents? _________________________________________________________________ _________________________________________________________________ _________________________________________________________________
Louisiana Division of Administration 126
After-School Enrichment
ADMINISTRATION 12.
13.
Arrivals and departures are supervised.
The hours of operation and the daily schedule are posted for the children and parents.
Children are supervised while at the Center.
Students' daily sign-in sheets are on file.
There is a process in place to follow up on absences.
The Program utilizes resources from the community.
Teachers receive performance reviews from the administrators.
There is a plan in place that addresses adequate staff coverage when emergencies arise.
The Center provides transportation for children.
1
2
3
Comments
14.
15.
16.
17.
18.
19.
20.
Louisiana Division of Administration 127
After-School Enrichment
21.
22.
23.
Drivers and vehicles are insured.
There are written job descriptions and personnel policies in place.
The staff members responsible for making instructional decisions have necessary knowledge of Louisiana's content standards and the ability to embed those standards into our center's activities.
We promote high expectations for all students.
There is a process in place that allows the classroom teachers to communicate feedback to the teachers at the center that connects the school curriculum and activities with the after-school activities.
We monitor grades, teacher created tests, and other outcomes to determine impact of our programming on student performance.
Staff periodically surveys families and children being served for other needs.
24.
25.
26.
27.
Louisiana Division of Administration 128
After-School Enrichment
28.
The program has the capacity to serve "special needs" children.
29.
A copy of the insurance policy for the property and/or building is on file.
ACTIVITIES 30.
31.
The staff can express the mission of the program.
The program has the resources to separate children by age for age appropriate activities.
There are sufficient materials to support program activities.
The climate/environment of the site allows children to meet needs for different physical activities.
There are enrichment activities as well as those that promote basic skills.
1
2
3
Comments
32.
33.
34.
Louisiana Division of Administration 129
After-School Enrichment
HUMAN BEHAVIOR 35.
Staff responds appropriately to the individual needs of children and youth.
1
2
3
Comments
36.
Staff encourages children and youth to make choices and become more responsible.
Staff interacts freely with children and youth to help them learn.
Staff uses positive reinforcement and other techniques to guide the behavior of children and youth.
37.
38.
39.
The children and youth generally interact with one another in positive ways.
The staff works well together to meet the needs of children.
The staff and families have the opportunity to interact often.
40.
41.
Louisiana Division of Administration 130
After-School Enrichment
HEALTH 42.
43.
There are adequate supplies and facilities for hand washing.
Staff and children wash hands frequently, especially after using the toilet or before preparing food.
The heat, ventilation, noise control, and light in the indoor space are adequate.
The staff protects children from communicable disease by separating children who become ill during the program.
1
2
3
Comments
44.
45.
SAFETY 46.
47.
48.
There are regularly scheduled fire drills.
The children know the proper exits and procedures in case of an emergency.
There are systems in place to protect children as they move from one activity to another.
1
2
3
Comments
Louisiana Division of Administration 131
After-School Enrichment
49.
There are systems in place to protect children from potential hazards such as caustic or toxic art materials; cleaning agents; medications; hot liquids; and overexposure to heat or cold.
There is a current Department of Health Inspection certificate posted.
There is a current Fire Marshall report on file.
The facility is wheelchair accessible.
Smoking is allowed in the center.
There is staff on site at all times with CPR or Red Cross training.
50.
51.
52.
53.
54.
NUTRITION 55.
56.
The program serves healthy foods.
Drinking water is readily available at all times.
1
2
3
Comments
Louisiana Division of Administration 132
After-School Enrichment
57.
Snacks and meals are timed appropriately for children in full day programs (summer and Saturday).
The area allocated to prepare snacks is sanitary.
58.
OUTDOOR ENVIRONMENT 59.
Each child has a chance to play outdoors for at least 30 minutes out of every three- hour block of time at the program.
Children use a variety of outdoor equipment and games for both active and quiet play.
Permanent playground equipment is suitable for the sizes and abilities of all children.
The outdoor space is suitable for a wide variety of activities.
1
2
3
Comments
60.
61.
62.
INDOOR ENVIRONMENT 63.
64.
There is enough room for all program activities.
The space is arranged so that various activities can go on at the same time without much disruption.
1
2
3
Comments
Louisiana Division of Administration 133
After-School Enrichment
65.
There is adequate and convenient storage space for equipment, materials, and personal possessions of children and staff.
Children can get materials out and put them away by themselves with ease.
66.
67.
68.
The indoor space reflects the work and interests of the children.
There are adequate amounts of desks, tables, chairs, etc.
Louisiana Division of Administration 134
